ARC 2: THE MIDDEN — SESSION MODULE

Party picks up at Sergius's shop in the Market of Sparks. Module ends at Hjolmar's Forge with the Mzinchaleft/Riften choice.

SESSION DASHBOARD Review in prep. Glance at during play.

THE CLOCK: DANICA'S CURE / THALMOR CONVERGENCE The plague clock and the political clock run simultaneously.
Tier 1 | Status Quo | Danica preparing cure. Thalmor watching. Tier 2 | Silent Academy | Taking Focal Crystal triggers this. | | Ancano has leverage. College goes quiet. Tier 3 | Point of No Return | Danica cures plague without them. | | They lose the narrative.
Reminder (use once per location change): "You hear a rumor in passing — a priestess in Riften has been asking after Wardens by name. She won't wait forever."
Notes: • Track by sessions, not hours. Players don't know the count. • Focal Crystal taken → Tier 2 activates silently (no announcement).
PLAYER STATUS BOARD
KYBOH Condition: Ceramic gloves fused to hands. Psychic static audible. Bones are enchanted (unknown to him until Hjolmar). Penalties: Crit fail range: _____ (Base: 20. After 1st strain: 19-20. After 2nd: 18-20.) Track overloads during play. Goal: Deliver Void Salts to Sergius → GET ENCHANTING TRAINING → Discover bone enchantment → HJOLMAR'S FORGE
ALFONSO Condition: Vrykolas transformation progressing. Nine theory rolls complete. Has stolen book ("Architecture of the Ideal Masters") — does not realize its significance to Nora. Penalties: None mechanical. Social: Nora will confront him. Goal: Complete enchanting training → SERGIUS'S SHOP → Explore Midden for magical knowledge
DAVINIA Condition: Crown of the Pale Lady active. Intuition Void penalty in effect. Father's recall order hanging over her. Tax collector murders known to party. Valerius has dossier. Penalties: Intuition Void (per Crown mechanics). Goal: Navigate Ancano's leverage → MIDDEN ENTRANCE → Decide on Focal Crystal → AUGUR'S CHAMBER
SAIJAH Condition: [Standard — no special conditions noted] Penalties: None. Goal: Navigate the Midden → SURVIVE
ORION Condition: [Standard — no special conditions noted] Penalties: None. Goal: Navigate the Midden → SURVIVE
NOT PRESENT THIS ARC: Ylva: At the Frozen Hearth inn. Bjorn: In the College plaza with the cart. Alfonso's Ghoul: Left with Varon (retcon available if wanted).
NPC VOICE REFERENCE
Sergius | Impatient academic, talks fast, values time over manners | "You're still here? I assumed you'd wandered off."
Nora | Quiet, precise, clinical under pressure. Trembles after. | "Excuse me. I believe you have something of mine."
Ancano | Silk over steel. Never raises voice. Every word chosen. | "A moment, Lady Caelinus. Just the two of us."
Augur | Hollow resonance. Speaks in metaphor. Not unkind. | "Another visitor. Tell me — do you seek, or are you sent?"
Hjolmar | Gruff, direct, alarmed when he sees the hands. | "Take those off. Now. Let me see."
Cultist | Frozen mid-scream. Does not speak. Expression tells all. (Root Chmbr)| [Describe only — preserved in Eldergleam root like amber.]
WHERE THINGS ARE (Navigation)
Sergius's Shop → Kyboh, Alfonso → Void Salts delivery, training Outside the Shop → Alfonso, Nora → Stolen book confrontation Midden Doors → Davinia, Ancano → Leverage scene, Focal Crystal ask Midden: Descent → Full party + Nora → 3x Focal Flame Atronachs Midden: Tunnels → Full party + Nora → 2x Structural Frost Atronachs Midden: Chamber → Full party + Nora → Tonal Flesh Atronach (Nora moment) Midden: Bridge → Full party + Nora → 2x Void Atronachs Atronach Forge → Full party + Nora → Storm Atronach BOSS Augur's Chamber → Davinia (+ party) → Focal Crystal decision Root Chamber → Full party → Dagon cultist revelation The Grate → Full party → Escape / drop to Singing Sea Singing Sea → Full party → [PUZZLE — TBD] Hjolmar's Forge → Kyboh (+ party) → Bone reveal, Anchor of Stasis

SCENES IN PLAY ORDER

SCENE 1: SERGIUS DELIVERS THE ULTIMATUM

Function: Sergius sets the Midden expedition in motion by demanding Void Salts from the Atronach Forge as payment for training. Location: Market of Sparks — Sergius's enchanting shop. Warm amber light from soul gem lamps. Smell of heated metal and ozone.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) Already established — party is here from last session. Alfonso has completed his nine theory rolls.
THE PEOPLE
SERGIUS TURRIANUS Voice: Clipped, impatient. Talks like he's billing you by the word. Attitude: Professionally neutral. Respects competence, despises wasted time. Cooperates for: Void Salts. That's it. Pisses him off: Haggling. Sentimentality. Asking twice.
The Ultimatum: "Your theory is adequate. Better than adequate, actually — I'm almost annoyed. But theory doesn't enchant weapons. I need Void Salts to demonstrate practical application, and I'm not wasting my stock on a student. The Atronach Forge in the Midden has what I need. Bring me Void Salts from the Forge, and we'll continue. Don't come back without them."
If asked about:
The Midden
"Underneath the College. Old tunnels. The


Forge is down there somewhere. Students used


to sneak in for experiments. I wouldn't."
Danger?
"It's the Midden. Things go wrong down


there because the magical field is unstable.


Everything is... louder. Stronger."
Can we buy salts?
"If you could afford them, you wouldn't be


asking me for free training."
Anything else down
"The Augur's chamber is past the Forge.
there?
Don't bother it. It has enough problems."

THE MOVES
No decision tree here — Sergius's terms are non-negotiable. The party's only move is to accept and head for the Midden.
✗ CANNOT negotiate price down. Void Salts or nothing. ✗ CANNOT buy salts elsewhere (not at Winterhold prices). ✓ CAN ask about the Midden and get useful intel (see table). ✓ CAN delay — but Sergius makes clear he has other students.
EXIT Party leaves the shop heading for the Midden. Nora intercepts outside. → SCENE 2.

SCENE 2: NORA'S INTERCEPT — THE STOLEN BOOK

Function: Nora confronts Alfonso about the stolen book and offers to guide the party through the Midden in exchange for its return. Location: Outside Sergius's shop, Market of Sparks corridor. Quiet. The hum of the College infrastructure is audible overhead.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "As you step out of Sergius's shop, a figure is waiting in the corridor. Nora. She's standing very still, hands clasped in front of her, but her knuckles are white. She's been here a while. Her eyes lock onto Alfonso, and when she speaks, her voice is steady but thin — the steadiness of someone holding themselves together by force of will."
Then improvise from: Cold stone, distant drip of snowmelt through cracks, the faint vibration of the Eye above them, breath visible in the chill.
THE PEOPLE
NORA ASHVALE Voice: Quiet, precise. Words chosen carefully. Slight tremor she can't fully suppress. Clinical vocabulary when stressed. Body language: Still. Too still. Hands clasped to stop them shaking. Attitude: Afraid. Determined. Not angry — just desperate. Cooperates for: The book returned. She'll do almost anything. Pisses her off: Being dismissed. Being treated as fragile.
Opening line: "Excuse me. I believe you have something of mine. 'The Architecture of the Ideal Masters.' You took it from my desk in the Arcanaeum while I was... while I couldn't stop you."
If asked about:
Why does she need
"My parents' souls are trapped in black
the book?
gems. That text contains the foundational


geometry of the Soul Cairn — it's the only


theoretical framework for extracting a soul


without destroying the vessel. It is the


only copy the College has."
Why was it on her
"Special dispensation from Urag. Restricted
desk?
section. Daedric Annex. I had to petition


for three months."
Why should they
"I know the Midden. I've studied its
help her?
structure. I can guide you to the Forge and


keep you alive down there. In exchange, I


just want my book back. That's all."
Why not report the
Long pause. "Because if I report it, the
theft?
College confiscates the book. Standard


procedure for restricted texts involved in


disputes. I lose access permanently."
What did Alfonso
She doesn't know. She just knows it was on
want with it?
her desk and then it wasn't and he was the


last person near her.

THE MOVES
ALFONSO → THE BOOK DECISION
Alfonso gives the book back now: → Nora is visibly relieved. Hands stop shaking. → She joins the party as guide. Full cooperation. → Her knowledge of the Midden provides tactical advantage (she warns about the Hyper-Structure before they enter). → Relationship: Grateful. Quiet loyalty.
Alfonso refuses or delays: → Nora doesn't beg. She goes quiet. Then: "I see. Then I'll be coming with you anyway. I need what's in the Forge chamber as much as you do. And I'll be watching for my book." → She still joins — but the dynamic is tense. → She is cooperative but guarded. No free intel. → The book becomes a hanging thread through the dungeon.
Alfonso asks what he wanted it for: → He saw "transmutation of life into stasis" and recognized relevance to his Peryite/Namira synthesis. He doesn't know it's her lifeline to her family. This is a character moment, not a negotiation — let the table feel the weight.
KEY NARRATIVE BEAT: Alfonso took the book during Nora's anxiety paralysis in the Arcanaeum. He swiped it from her desk while she was frozen. He may not even remember doing it — it was impulsive, driven by research hunger. Nora remembers everything.
EXIT Nora joins the party (willing or reluctant). Party heads for the Midden entrance. → SCENE 3: Ancano intercepts at the doors.

SCENE 3: ANCANO AT THE MIDDEN DOORS

Function: Ancano isolates Davinia to leverage the tax collector murders and request she retrieve the Focal Crystal from the Augur. Location: Heavy iron doors leading down into the Midden. Cold draft rising from below. The doors are unlocked but heavy.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The Midden doors are set into the floor at the far end of the lower corridor — two heavy iron grates hinged into stone, with a cold updraft that smells of wet rock and old magic. As your party reaches them, a voice comes from behind you. Ancano. He's been following. He stands with his hands clasped behind his back, perfectly composed, and his eyes are on Davinia."
Then improvise from: Draft from below carries ozone smell. Distant hum of the Eye resonating through stone. Other students avoid this corridor — too cold, too close to the experiments.
THE PEOPLE
ANCANO Voice: Silk over steel. Low volume, intimate distance. Every word is a move in a game. Never rushes. Never raises his voice. Body language: Still, composed, hands behind back. Steps between Davinia and the rest of the party as if it's the most natural thing in the world. Attitude: Calculating. Not hostile — that would be crude. Cooperates for: The Focal Crystal. Davinia's compliance. Pisses him off: Being ignored. Being treated as unimportant.
Opening move: He addresses the party casually: "Heading into the Midden? How industrious." Then, quieter, angling toward Davinia while the others deal with the heavy doors:
"A moment, Lady Caelinus. Just the two of us."
The Hushed Conversation (to Davinia):
"I'll be direct. Valerius has a dossier. You know what's in it. I know what's in it. The Empire knows collectors were murdered — they don't officially know it was your Wardens. Yet."
Pause. Let her react.
"Your father's recall order is already drafted. The Dominion has a copy of the evidence waiting for an official stamp. Once that stamp goes down, it's not just your career — it's your father's legacy. Your uncle's position with the Stormcloaks. Everything your family has built on both sides of this war."
The Offer: "There is a crystal in the Augur's chamber below. The Focal Crystal. Bring it to me. In exchange, I delete the physical evidence from the Dominion registry before the stamp. Valerius keeps his copy — I can't help that — but without the Dominion's corroboration, his dossier is just paper. Allegations. Deniable."
If asked about:
Why does he want
"That's not your concern. Let's say it
the crystal?
serves the College's interests."
What if she refuses
"Then I have no reason to help you. And the


stamp goes down by end of week."
Can she trust him?
"Trust is for people without leverage. We


have a transaction. That's better."
What about the rest
If Davinia is difficult, he WILL say this
of the party?
loud enough for the others to hear. He


doesn't care about her "peons." None of


them make decisions without her.

THE MOVES
DAVINIA → THE ANCANO DECISION
Davinia agrees (or says she'll think about it): → Ancano nods. "I'll be here when you return." → Focal Crystal retrieval becomes an active objective in the Augur's chamber (Scene 9). → Does NOT change anything about the Midden itself.
Davinia refuses outright: → Ancano's expression doesn't change. "Unfortunate. I hope your family name survives the week." → He walks away. The stamp goes down (future consequence). → Focal Crystal is still in the Augur's chamber if she changes her mind.
Davinia confronts / threatens: → Ancano is unflappable. He has nothing to lose here. → If she escalates, he raises his voice so the party hears: "Ask your Lady about the tax collectors on the Pale Pass. Ask her what the Wardens did." → This forces a party conversation. Good drama.
THE PARTY ALREADY KNOWS about the murders. This is not a reveal to them — it's a reveal that ANCANO knows, and that the Dominion has evidence. The political dimension is new.
EXIT Party descends into the Midden. Ancano remains topside. → SCENE 4: The Midden — Hyper-Structure begins.

SCENE 4: THE MIDDEN — DESCENT

Function: First Midden combat. Establishes the Hyper-Structure rules. Party learns that magic is dangerously amplified down here. Location: Steep stone stairs descending into carved tunnels. The air changes immediately — pressure increases, sound distorts.
⚡ ⚡ HYPER-STRUCTURE RULES — ACTIVE FOR ALL MIDDEN SCENES ⚡
ALL spells auto-succeed and auto-crit (2x damage/heal/effect) Applies to PLAYERS and ENEMIES equally Enchantments are EXEMPT (enchanted sword fire = normal) Raw spellcasting only (Fireball = 2x, enchanted flame = 1x)
This is the Eye of Magnus bleeding math into the stone. The Midden is a cathedral of uncontrolled magical amplification.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The stairs spiral down into wet stone. The moment you cross the threshold, you feel it — a pressure change, like descending into deep water. The air hums. Not with sound exactly, but with potential, like standing inside a tuning fork the size of a cathedral. Magelight orbs flicker along the walls — some have been here for decades, sustained by the ambient field. The first chamber opens into a wide landing where three shapes float in the darkness ahead, trailing ribbons of white-hot flame."
Then improvise from: Wet stone smell replaced by ozone. Sound echoes wrong — footsteps arrive before feet touch ground. Hair stands on end. Nora's breath catches.
NORA'S WARNING (if she's cooperative): Before the first fight, Nora says: "The field down here amplifies everything. Every spell you cast will hit harder than you expect. Every spell THEY cast will too. Be precise. Don't overcommit."
If she's NOT cooperative (book not returned): She says nothing. They learn the hard way.
COMBAT: 3x FOCAL FLAME ATRONACHS (TL1)
ARENA:
[FA1] [FA2] [FA3]

======= stairs up =======
(party enters)

FOCAL FLAME ATRONACH (×3) Archetype: TL1 Ranged Elemental (Construct — FP as health) FP Pool: _____ / 20 each DR: 2 IMMUNE: Fire, Poison, Bleed, Disease (Construct) WEAK: Frost — DOUBLE damage
ATTACKS (Hyper-Structure doubles all spell damage):
Firebolt (spell)
Ranged
6 base → 12 (Hyper-Structure)




Target burns 2/turn for 2 turns
Flame Burst (aura)
10ft
4 fire to adjacent at start of




its turn → 8 (Hyper-Structure)

PASSIVE — Focal Lens: If two or more Atronachs are within 15ft of each other, their Firebolts deal +2 damage (before Hyper-Structure doubling).
BEHAVIOR: Spread out and maintain Focal Lens range. Target the squishiest party member. If one dies, the others close ranks.
HOW PLAYERS WIN THIS OBVIOUS (Brute Force): Tank the fire, burn them down. Costly in HP but achievable. Each has only 20 FP.
SMART: Davinia's frost magic deals DOUBLE damage AND gets the Hyper-Structure 2x. Ice Spike base 4 frost → 8 (double) → 16 (Hyper-Structure). One-shots each Atronach.
BRILLIANT: Separate them to break Focal Lens, then pick off one at a time. Use terrain (stairs) to funnel.
WHEN THEY DIE: "The Atronach flickers, its form stuttering like a candle in wind, then detonates in a shower of sparks and cooling slag."
LOOT: None (constructs). Residual fire salts if anyone checks.
EVERY ROUND REMEMBER: • Hyper-Structure: ALL spell damage is doubled (theirs AND yours) • Flame Burst aura: 8 damage to adjacent at start of Atronach turn • Focal Lens: +2 (before doubling) if two Atronachs within 15ft
AFTER THE FIGHT: First taste of the Hyper-Structure. If anyone cast a healing spell, they noticed it healed double too. Nora is calm — she expected this.
→ Continue deeper. SCENE 5: Tunnels.

SCENE 5: THE MIDDEN — TUNNELS

Function: Second encounter. Frost atronachs in tight quarters test melee survivability. Optional: place an Unstable Zone (Magnetic Polarity trap) in a side tunnel to foreshadow the boss mechanic. Location: Narrow tunnels carved into the mountain. Ice on the walls from frost seepage. Ceilings low enough that tall characters duck.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The tunnels narrow. Ice crusts the walls — not natural frost, but formations that look deliberate. Shapes that repeat. Curves that echo each other. It looks like writing. Like something carved these patterns on purpose, in a language made of cold."
Then improvise from: Breath clouds thick. Ice underfoot is slick but not slippery — it grips like coral. The patterns pulse faintly with the Eye's resonance. If anyone asks: yes, it does look like language. No one can read it. Except —
WHAT'S IN THIS ROOM
ICE ATRONACH LANGUAGE: What they see: Ice formations on the walls that resemble writing. Deliberate patterns. Repeating structures. Not random frost. If they investigate: Magic roll — the patterns ARE language. Ice atronach script. The Eye's field is forcing so much energy through the leylines that the ambient discharge is crystallizing into the only structure it knows: the language of ice itself. The Midden's walls are covered in involuntary writing — the magical equivalent of a pipe screaming under pressure. Why planted here: Davinia's Crown recognizes it. This triggers the transformation.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA'S TRANSFORMATION — THE ISMARA SIGHT
This is not a combat moment. This is wonder.
Davinia touches the ice on the walls. The Crown resonates. She recognizes something in the patterns — not the shapes themselves, but something BENEATH them. Intent. Meaning. The ice is writing, and she almost — ALMOST — can read it.
She shatters her own eyes and replaces them with ice-magic perception. This is a PERMANENT, IRREVERSIBLE change. Davinia no longer has human eyes. She has Ismara's.
Read aloud (to Davinia's player only): "The ice on the walls is writing. You knew that before anyone said it. The Crown knew. You can feel the meaning pressing against the back of your eyes like a word on the tip of your tongue — so close, so close —
The Crown pulses. Not a whisper. A door opening.
And you step through.
When you open your eyes, you can read it.
Not the symbols. You can't even see the symbols anymore. You see what's INSIDE them — the intent, the pressure, the raw meaning the ice was trying to express. It's not a message. It's a scream.
The leylines beneath the College are overloaded. The Eye of Magnus is pouring more energy through this stone than it was ever built to carry. The Midden isn't a basement. It's a pressure valve. And the valve is failing. The ice is the overflow — magic so dense it's crystallizing into the only language it knows. And it's saying one thing:
TOO MUCH. TOO MUCH. TOO MUCH.
Your companions look different now. You can see their auras — faint halos of living energy around fragile frames of bone and tendon. They look... breakable.
The Crown whispers: 'Now you see.'"
FROM THIS POINT FORWARD: Every scene has a 👁️ DAVINIA SEES section with perception information only she receives. See the Wizard Eyes addendum for full rules.
OPTIONAL — UNSTABLE ZONE (side tunnel): What they see: A short dead-end tunnel where the air shimmers. Metal objects (belt buckles, sword pommels) tug toward the center of the tunnel. If they investigate: Anyone entering is PULLED 10ft toward center. Magnetic Polarity effect. No damage, but demonstrates the mechanic before the boss fight. Why planted here: Teaches the polarity mechanic in a safe context.
COMBAT: 2x STRUCTURAL FROST ATRONACHS (TL1)
ARENA:
[party] ===narrow=== [SFA1] [SFA2]
(tight quarters)
STRUCTURAL FROST ATRONACH (×2) Archetype: TL1 Melee Tank (Construct — FP as health) FP Pool: _____ / 40 each DR: 6 (solid ice) IMMUNE: Frost, Poison, Bleed, Disease (Construct) WEAK: Fire — DOUBLE damage
ATTACKS (Hyper-Structure doubles spell damage):
Frost Slam (physical)
Melee
8 damage (NOT doubled — physical




attack, not a spell)
Frostbite Aura
10ft
3 frost + 3 FP drain per turn
(spell/passive)


→ 6 frost + 6 FP (Hyper-Struct)

PASSIVE — Frostbite Slam: On a successful melee hit, target is Slowed (loses Minor Action) for their next turn.
BEHAVIOR: Block the tunnel. Force melee engagement. They don't chase — they hold ground and punish anyone who enters their space.
HOW PLAYERS WIN THIS OBVIOUS: Melee brawl in tight quarters. Expensive — their Frostbite Aura drains FP, and 40 FP each with DR 6 is thick.
SMART: Fire magic + Hyper-Structure. Alfonso's fire does double damage doubled again = devastating. Flames (3 base → 6 weakness → 12 Hyper-Structure).
BRILLIANT: Lure one out of the tunnel to separate them. The narrow passage means only one party member can engage at a time unless they get creative with positioning.
WHEN THEY DIE: "The Atronach cracks — a clean, surgical split down the center. Both halves topple inward and shatter into a cascade of ice shards that ring like broken glass."
LOOT: Frost salts (×2) — useful for enchanting or alchemy.
EVERY ROUND REMEMBER: • Hyper-Structure on spells only (their Frost Slam is physical) • Frostbite Aura: 6 frost + 6 FP drain at start of Atronach turn • Slow on hit: target loses Minor Action next turn
AFTER THE FIGHT: Tunnels open up into a larger chamber ahead. The hum gets louder. Something organic is in the next room — you can smell it.
→ SCENE 6: Tonal Flesh Atronach.

SCENE 6: THE TONAL FLESH ATRONACH — NORA'S MOMENT

Function: The puzzle encounter. Physical attacks feed the creature. Party must recognize the pattern and switch to pure magic — or Nora intervenes with a Master-level SEVER. This is Nora's character- defining combat moment. Location: Wide circular chamber. Brass wiring in the floor traces concentric circles. The air vibrates with a low-frequency hum that you feel in your teeth.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The chamber is round and the ceiling is high. Brass wire is embedded in the floor in concentric circles — some kind of resonance array. In the center stands something that used to be alive. A massive, asymmetrical mound of muscle and organs, seven feet tall, stitched together with brass wiring that pulses with amber light. It has no face. It has no soul. It just hums — a deep, oscillating frequency that makes the air vibrate and your fillings ache. The moment you enter, it turns toward you. Not with eyes. With sound."
Then improvise from: Smell of copper and old meat. The hum changes pitch when people move — it's tracking them by vibration. The brass circles in the floor glow faintly in response to the creature's pulse. Nora has gone very still.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene 6 — entering the chamber)
The brass wiring pulses with visible magical current — a closed circuit feeding from the floor rings into the creature and back. No soul inside it. Where a living thing has a warm aura, this has a cold loop — a frequency holding dead flesh in the shape of life.
COMBAT CLUE: She can see the creature is SUSTAINED by the circuit, not alive because of it. If asked: "It's not alive. It's being held together by the wiring. The wiring is the thing, not the meat." This hints at the puzzle solution but doesn't hand it to them — she can see the structure, not the kinetic feedback mechanic.
COMBAT: TONAL FLESH ATRONACH (TL2)
ARENA:
+----------+ +--| [TFA] |--+ +--| | (center) | |--+ | | +----------+ | | +--| brass rings |--+ +----------------+
[party enters from south]
TONAL FLESH ATRONACH Archetype: TL2 Elite Brute (Biological — HP, not FP) HP: _____ / 120 DR: 8 (hyper-structured flesh, dense as oak) IMMUNE: Fear, Mind-affecting (no brain) WEAK: Pure magic damage bypasses the Recursive loop
ATTACKS:
Tonal Pulse (aura)
10ft
4 Irreducible Magic Damage to
(start of its turn)


everyone in range. Cannot be




reduced by DR or resistance.
Kinetic Thresher
Melee
15 damage + current Kinetic
(physical attack)


Charge total added to damage.

⚠️ THE RECURSIVE FREQUENCY ANCHOR ⚠️ This creature is a biological battery for kinetic energy. It has no brain — only a Tonal Anchor (a frequency holding the flesh together).
FEEDING THE LOOP: Every time a player hits with a PHYSICAL attack (Might or Agility based — swords, arrows, fists), the Golem gains +1 Kinetic Charge.
RESULT OF CHARGES: • Damage Spike: Adds total Kinetic Charges to its next attack. (e.g., 3 charges = Kinetic Thresher deals 15 + 3 = 18) • Regeneration: Heals 10 HP at start of its turn. If 5+ Kinetic Charges: heals 20 HP instead.
RESETTING THE LOOP: If the Golem goes ONE FULL ROUND without being hit by a physical attack, all Kinetic Charges reset to 0 and regeneration drops back to 10 HP/turn.
Kinetic Charge Tracker: Charges: [ ] [ ] [ ] [ ] [ ] [ ] [ ] [ ] [ ] [ ]
BEHAVIOR: Moves toward the loudest source of vibration (whoever hit it last physically). If multiple melee attackers, targets the one who dealt the most physical damage. Does not pursue ranged attackers who haven't hit it.
HOW PLAYERS WIN THIS OBVIOUS (Expensive): Keep hitting it physically. Possible but the regeneration and escalating damage will drain all their resources. 120 HP + 10-20 HP/turn regen against DR 8 is a brutal war of attrition. Not recommended.
SMART (The Intended Puzzle): Stop hitting it physically. Use pure magic damage ONLY. Spells bypass the Recursive Anchor entirely — no charges added, no enhanced regen triggered. With Hyper-Structure doubling all spell damage, focused magic fire melts it. Example: Firebolt (6 base → 12 Hyper) bypasses DR 8 if > 8 total. Actually — DR still applies to magic damage. Need spells that exceed DR 8 after Hyper-Structure.
BRILLIANT: Combine "stop physical attacks" with Davinia's ice architecture to wall off melee while casters burn it down from range with amplified spells.
DESPERATE (Nora's Intervention): If the party hasn't figured it out after 3-4 rounds and the Golem is getting stronger:
NORA'S SEVER
Trigger: GM call. Party struggling, Golem escalating.
She speaks with focused, clinical speed: "It's recursive! The anchor is a harmonic loop — stop hitting it! You're just giving it more energy to hold itself together!"
If party STILL can't solve it (or she decides to act): She steps forward and performs a sharp "snipping" gesture.
Mechanic: Master-level SEVER gesture + Adept Banishment Cost: 6 FP Roll: Auto-success (Hyper-Structure) Effect: Cuts the Anchor holding the flesh together. The Golem instantly loses animation. It doesn't die — it becomes 600 lbs of cold, inanimate meat.
IMPORTANT: This does NOT auto-end the fight if the party can solve it themselves. Nora intervenes if they're stuck. If they switch to pure magic and are winning, she watches and lets them handle it.
WHEN IT DIES (by magic) / WHEN NORA SEVERS IT: By magic: "The flesh begins to liquefy. The brass wiring goes dark, circuit by circuit, and the entire mass collapses inward like a deflating balloon. Wet. Heavy. Still."
By Nora: "She makes one sharp motion — fingers together, then apart, like cutting a thread. The hum stops. Not fades. Stops. The mass hits the floor all at once, 600 pounds of dead weight. The brass wiring clatters against stone."
AFTERMATH — THE CRASH: The crisis competence fades. Nora looks at her hands. They're trembling. She avoids the party's eyes. Looks at Alfonso.
Nora: "It... it was just a loop. I didn't mean to make such a mess. Please... can I have my book back now? I'm not supposed to be down here."
LOOT: Brass Wiring (magical component), Tonal Resonance Fragment (quest item — relevant to Hjolmar's work).
EVERY ROUND REMEMBER: • Tonal Pulse: 4 Irreducible to everyone within 10ft at start of turn • Track Kinetic Charges (physical hits only) • Regen: 10 HP/turn (or 20 if 5+ charges) • Full round no physical hits = charges reset to 0
ROUND TRACKER:
 Rnd | Golem HP | K.Charges | Regen | Notes
  ----+----------+-----------+-------+---------------------
   1  |    /120  |           |       |
   2  |    /120  |           |       |
   3  |    /120  |           |       |
   4  |    /120  |           |       |
   5  |    /120  |           |       |
   6  |    /120  |           |       |
   7  |    /120  |           |       |
   8  |    /120  |           |       |

SCALING: If party struggles: Nora warns them verbally earlier (Round 2). If party breezes: Golem starts with 3 Kinetic Charges (students were hitting it before the party arrived).
AFTER THE FIGHT: Major character moment for Nora. If book hasn't been returned, this is the strongest emotional pressure point to do so. Nora is shaking but functional.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene 6 — after the flesh atronach falls)
The brass wiring in the floor: She reads the intent of the concentric circles. This was a containment array — designed to hold something in place and feed it energy. She doesn't need a Magic roll. She sees what the builders MEANT when they inscribed the circles. A cage made of math.
The dead flesh: Nothing. No aura. No soul. No residual glow. It's the first truly EMPTY thing she's seen with her new eyes. Everything else — her companions, the ice, the leylines — has light. This is just meat. It was animated by frequency, not by spirit. That absence is deeply unsettling. The Crown is silent about it. Ismara has nothing to say about soulless things.
Nora: First real look at Nora's aura with the new eyes. It's strange. Dense. Tightly wound — like a spring under compression. The Atronach Stone signature is visible as a kind of inward pull, magic flowing INTO her rather than radiating out. And underneath that, something bigger. Something she's not using. Davinia can see that Nora is carrying far more magical potential than she's showing. She doesn't know what it is. Just that it's there. (This is the unconscious Master Conjuration.)
→ Continue to bridge. SCENE 7: Void Atronachs.

SCENE 7: THE BRIDGE — VOID ATRONACHS

Function: Final gatekeepers before the boss. Void Atronachs introduce a dangerous mechanic — they drain magic, making the party conserve resources before the big fight. Location: A stone bridge spanning a deep chasm. The forge chamber glows distantly on the other side. Wind from below.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "A stone bridge, thirty feet long and barely wide enough for two abreast, spans a chasm that drops into darkness. On the far side, you can see the warm amber glow of the Atronach Forge chamber. Two shapes hover above the bridge — dark, geometric, wrong. They look like holes in the air. Voids. Negative space where reality should be. They pulse with a quiet, hungry sound."
Then improvise from: Wind from below carries heat — the Forge is active. The Void Atronachs distort light around them like heat shimmer. Looking directly at them causes mild vertigo.
COMBAT: 2x VOID ATRONACHS (TL1)
ARENA:
[forge glow] [VA1] [VA2] =======bridge========== (30ft, narrow) [party]
~~ chasm below ~~
VOID ATRONACH (×2) Archetype: TL1 Anti-Magic Sentinel (Construct — FP as health) FP Pool: _____ / 25 each DR: 4 IMMUNE: Poison, Bleed, Disease (Construct), Necrotic WEAK: Restoration/Holy magic — DOUBLE damage
ATTACKS (Hyper-Structure doubles spell damage): 
Void Bolt (spell)
Ranged
5 necrotic → 10 (Hyper-Struct)




Target loses 3 FP on hit.
Null Field (aura)
15ft
Passive: all spell costs within




15ft increased by +2 FP.

PASSIVE — Null Field: While within 15ft of a Void Atronach, all spellcasting costs +2 FP extra. This stacks if both Atronachs are in range (+4 FP total).
BEHAVIOR: Hold the bridge. They don't cross to the party side. Force the party to come to them through the Null Field. Target whoever has the most FP remaining (they can sense it).
HOW PLAYERS WIN THIS OBVIOUS: Rush the bridge, tank the Void Bolts, engage melee. Physical attacks work fine — no recursive gimmick here. Just expensive because Null Field drains FP and Void Bolts hurt.
SMART: Ranged physical attacks (arrows) from outside Null Field range. Void Atronachs have only 25 FP each and DR 4.
BRILLIANT: Restoration magic from range. Sun Fire and similar holy spells deal DOUBLE damage + Hyper-Structure 2x. Sun Fire: 6 base → 12 (holy double) → 24 (Hyper-Structure). One-shot territory.
WHEN THEY DIE: "The Void collapses in on itself with a sound like a gasp played in reverse. For a moment, there's a perfect sphere of nothing where it was. Then even that is gone."
LOOT: Void Salts (×2) — QUEST ITEM for Sergius.
EVERY ROUND REMEMBER: • Null Field: +2 FP cost to ALL spells within 15ft (stacks ×2) • Void Bolt: 10 necrotic + 3 FP drain • Bridge is narrow — max 2 abreast, falling is possible
AFTER THE FIGHT: ✓ VOID SALTS OBTAINED (×2). Sergius's requirement met. Bridge is clear. Forge chamber ahead. DAVINIA GAVE UP MEMORY OF HER MOTHER FOR COMPLETE KNOWLEDGE OF THESE FROM ISMARA. ENCOUNTER TRIVIALIZED.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene 7 — the bridge)
The Void Atronachs are the worst things she's seen with the new eyes. Everyone else sees dark shapes. She sees HOLES. Actual holes in the magical field — places where light, aura, and intent simply stop existing. Looking at them is like looking at blindness itself.
The Null Field is visible to her as a sphere of dimming around each one — her companions' auras flicker and shrink as they step into range, like candle flames in wind. She can see the FP drain happening as light leaving their bodies and falling into the void.
When they die: She sees the hole close. Reality stitching itself shut. Brief. Clean. Gone. The relief is physical.
The forge glow on the far side: She can see leylines converging ahead — four bright channels feeding into a central point. The boss room is lit up like a bonfire to her sight before they even enter. (This gives her advance warning of the pillar mechanic.)
→ SCENE 8: Storm Atronach Boss.

SCENE 8: THE ATRONACH FORGE — BOSS FIGHT

Function: The climactic combat. Rogue Storm Atronach powered by the Eye's leylines. Environmental puzzle (pillars) + Magnetic Polarity hazard + Davinia's frost weakness = dynamic, multi-layered fight. Location: Massive circular chamber. The Atronach Forge dominates the center — a brass-and-stone apparatus the size of a house. Four brass pillars at cardinal points connect to leylines in the ceiling.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The Forge chamber is enormous — a cathedral of brass and stone. The Atronach Forge itself sits at the center, a mechanical altar wreathed in arcing lightning. Four brass pillars, each fifteen feet tall, stand at the north, south, east, and west edges of the chamber, and you can see light pulsing through them — raw magicka flowing down from the Eye above, feeding into the Forge like arteries. And above the Forge, held aloft by that power, spins the Rogue Storm Atronach. A whirlwind of rock and lightning the size of a wagon, crackling with so much energy that your hair stands on end from across the room. It sees you. The lightning intensifies."
Then improvise from: Ozone so thick you can taste it. The floor vibrates with each pulse of the leylines. Metal objects on your person buzz and tug. Nora backs toward the wall.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene 8 — entering the Forge)
This room is blinding. Four rivers of raw magical energy pour from the ceiling through the pillars and into the Forge — bright white-blue channels feeding the Storm Atronach like arteries feeding a heart. She can see the energy cycling: down through pillars, into Forge, up into Atronach, back through ceiling to the Eye. A closed loop.
TACTICAL ADVANTAGE: She can see the pillars are the feed system. No investigation roll. She can TELL the party: "Break the pillars. They're feeding it." As each pillar is destroyed, she sees the corresponding leyline go dark. Like watching a wound close.
At 50% (polarity shift): She sees the energy flow REVERSE in the remaining leylines. She can warn the party a half-second before the Repulse hits.
CROWN REACTION: The Crown approves of this room. Davinia is seeing infrastructure, systems, architecture — seeing the world the way Ismara does. Quiet warmth from the Crown. It feels like being good at something. That's the trap.
COMBAT: ROGUE STORM ATRONACH (TL3 BOSS)
ARENA:
[PILLAR N] | | [PILLAR W]--[FORGE/BOSS]--[PILLAR E] | | [PILLAR S]
[party enters from south bridge] 1ZAC AVA4 5ARRIC 9KANAN ME
ROGUE STORM ATRONACH Archetype: TL3 Boss (Construct — FP as health) FP Pool: ___5__ / 180 DR: NO HP (rocky hide + leyline reinforcement) IMMUNE: Shock, Poison, Bleed, Disease (Construct) WEAK: Water — DOUBLE damage Frost — DOUBLE damage (Davinia devastates here) NOTE: Pure magic of any element damages normally. DAVINIA HAD ISMARA JOG MEMORY.
ATTACKS (Hyper-Structure doubles ALL spell damage):
Chain Lightning
Ranged
20 primary / 10 secondary / 5
(spell — main attack)


tertiary




→ 40 / 20 / 10 (Hyper-Struct)




Also drains 2 FP per target hit
Lightning Surge
20ft
Charged ground attack. Everyone
(area — recharge)
radius
in range: 10 → 20 (H-S) shock




Used when below 50% FP.
Rock Slam (physical)
Melee
15 damage. NOT doubled (physical)




Knocks target prone.

PASSIVE — Leyline Feed: While any Pillar is intact, the Boss regenerates 5 FP at the start of each round per intact pillar. (4 pillars = 20 FP/round.)
PASSIVE — Storm Aura: All creatures within 10ft take 3 shock damage at the end of the Boss's turn (→ 6, Hyper-Structure).
BEHAVIOR: Hovers above the Forge (10ft elevation). Uses Chain Lightning as primary attack, targeting clusters. When below 50% FP, starts using Lightning Surge. Targets whoever damaged a Pillar with Rock Slam if they get close.
PHASE TRANSITION — At 90 FP (50%): "The Atronach screams — a sound like a transformer exploding. The leylines flare white-hot and the magnetic polarity reverses." → Polarity shifts from PULL to REPULSE (see below). → Lightning Surge unlocked. → Boss behavior becomes more aggressive (targets healers).
⚡ MAGNETIC POLARITY — BOSS ROOM HAZARD ⚡
Triggers: Start of EACH TURN (everyone moves simultaneously)
ROUNDS 1-3 (Boss FP > 90): PULL Everyone wearing/carrying metal is dragged 10ft toward the Forge. Might roll (TN 14) to resist. Failure = moved.
ROUNDS 4+ (Boss FP ≤ 90): REPULSE Everyone wearing/carrying metal is pushed 10ft away from the Forge. Might roll (TN 14) to resist. Melee attackers pushed out of range every round.
COUNTERPLAY: Drop metal items. Unarmored = immune. Nora is unaffected (robes only).
LEYLINE PILLARS (×4) The environmental puzzle. Destroying pillars is the smart play.
PILLAR N: HP _____ / 20 DR: 0 [ ] Intact [ ] Destroyed PILLAR S: HP _____ / 20 DR: 0 [ ] Intact [ ] Destroyed PILLAR E: HP _____ / 20 DR: 0 [ ] Intact [ ] Destroyed PILLAR W: HP _____ / 20 DR: 0 [ ] Intact [ ] Destroyed
When a Pillar is destroyed: • Severed leyline deals 20 IRREDUCIBLE DAMAGE to the Boss. • Boss loses 5 FP/round regeneration from that pillar. • Visible effect: the leyline in the ceiling goes dark, the Boss flickers and screams.
All four destroyed: 80 Irreducible Damage total to Boss. Effective fight becomes 180 - 80 = 100 FP remaining. All regeneration stops.
HOW PLAYERS WIN THIS OBVIOUS (Damage Sponge — Hard): Ignore pillars, focus-fire the boss. Must out-damage 20 FP/round regen + DR 9. Total damage needed: 180 FP + regen. Very expensive.
SMART (Pillars First): Split party — some attack pillars (20 HP, DR 0 = easy to break), some keep the Boss busy. Four destroyed pillars = 80 free damage + no more regen. Fight becomes much more manageable.
BRILLIANT (Davinia + Pillars): Davinia's frost magic deals DOUBLE damage (weakness) × 2 (Hyper-Structure) = QUADRUPLE effective damage against the Boss. Ice Spike: 4 base → 8 (frost weakness) → 16 (Hyper-Structure). Ice Storm: 6 base → 12 → 24 to all in path. Combine with pillar destruction for devastating efficiency.
DESPERATE: If party is getting shredded by Chain Lightning (40/20/10 is brutal), spread out to minimize chain targets and focus all resources on one pillar at a time. Even one destroyed pillar = 20 free damage + reduced regen.
WHEN IT DIES (0 FP): "The Storm Atronach's rotation slows. The lightning arcs become erratic, lashing the walls and ceiling. Then the core — a dense knot of rock and energy at its center — cracks. The detonation is silent for one heartbeat. Then it's not.
CORE BREACH: Everyone within 20ft must make an Agility roll (TN 12). Failure: 10 shock damage. Success: half damage."
"When the light clears, the Forge is dark. The leylines are dead. Void Salts crystallize on the floor around the wreckage — the Storm Atronach's remains rendered into alchemical components."
LOOT:
Void Salts (×4)
Additional salts beyond bridge


loot. Sergius will be pleased.
Storm Atronach Core
Rare magical component. Could be


used for Expert-level enchanting.
Leyline Fragment
From destroyed pillars. Hjolmar


might find these interesting.

ROUND TRACKER:
 Rnd | Boss FP | Pillars (N/S/E/W) | Polarity | Notes
  ----+---------+-------------------+----------+--------------
   1  |   /180  |  / / / /          | PULL     |
   2  |   /180  |  / / / /          | PULL     |
   3  |   /180  |  / / / /          | PULL     |
   4  |   /180  |  / / / /          | check    |
   5  |   /180  |  / / / /          |          |
   6  |   /180  |  / / / /          |          |
   7  |   /180  |  / / / /          |          |
   8  |   /180  |  / / / /          |          |
   9  |   /180  |  / / / /          |          |
  10  |   /180  |  / / / /          |          |

EVERY ROUND REMEMBER: • Leyline Feed: +5 FP regen per intact pillar at start of round • Magnetic Polarity: PULL (Rounds 1-3) / REPULSE (4+). Might TN 14. • Storm Aura: 6 shock to everyone within 10ft at end of Boss turn • Chain Lightning chains: position party to minimize secondary hits • Hyper-Structure: ALL spell damage doubled (theirs AND yours)
SCALING: If party struggles: A pillar is already cracked (10/20 HP). If party breezes: Boss uses Chain Lightning twice per round when below 50%.
AFTER THE FIGHT: The Forge is silent. The chamber beyond leads to the Augur. If Davinia accepted Ancano's deal, the Focal Crystal is there.
→ SCENE 9: Augur's Chamber / Focal Crystal. DAVINIA GAVE ISMARA HER RIGHT HAND NOW HAS MAGIC WIZARD RIGHT HAND IN EXCHANGE FOR ENGINEERING KNOW HOW TO MAKE A DWEMMER DYNAMO TO CAPTURE THE ENERGY OF THE FORGE. KYBOH GOT THE FOCUSING CRYSTAL AND WILL USE IT TO COMMUNICATE WITH THE AUGUR. 

SCENE 9: THE AUGUR'S CHAMBER — THE FOCAL CRYSTAL

Function: Davinia decides whether to take the Focal Crystal for Ancano. The Augur warns but does not resist. Taking it activates Tier 2 on the Thalmor clock. Location: Small chamber past the Forge. Circular. Blue light. A containment field hums at the center.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "Past the dead Forge, a narrow passage leads to a circular chamber bathed in blue light. The walls are smooth — not carved, but worn by centuries of magical resonance. At the center, a jagged shard of translucent crystal floats in a containment field, spinning slowly. It's blue — not ice-blue, but deeper, like looking through glass into another sky. It hums in perfect harmony with something far above you. The Eye.
And then a voice. Not from a mouth. From everywhere.
'Another visitor. Tell me — do you seek, or are you sent?'"
Then improvise from: The chamber is warm despite the blue light. The crystal's rotation is hypnotic. The Augur's presence feels like standing in sunlight — warm but impersonal.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene 9 — the Augur's Chamber)
The Augur is not a voice. The Augur IS the room. The walls themselves are alive — a single distributed consciousness woven into the stone like dye through cloth. The blue light isn't lighting. It's him. He is everywhere in here. A mind pressed into architecture.
She recognizes this. The Crown does the same thing. Ismara was trying to become a room. The Augur already did.
The Focal Crystal is almost too bright to look at. She can see a single clean harmonic line linking the crystal to the Eye through a mile of mountain. It IS a tuner. She doesn't need the Augur to explain it. She can see the function.
If she takes it: she will see the harmonic line snap. She will FEEL the Eye go untuned. The Augur dims — not pain, but resignation. She sees that too.
CROWN REACTION: Silence. The Crown recognizes the Augur's state and says nothing. This is what Ismara almost became. This is what Ismara still wants to become — through Davinia. The silence is not disapproval. It's longing.
THE PEOPLE
THE AUGUR OF DUNLAIN Voice: Hollow resonance. Comes from the walls. Speaks in metaphor but with genuine concern, not condescension. Not unkind. Body language: Non-corporeal. Light shifts when he "speaks." Attitude: Patient. Weary. Has seen many come for the crystal. Cooperates for: Nothing. He offers wisdom, not help.
If asked about:
What is the crystal?
"A tuner. A lens. It harmonizes the Eye's


output into frequencies the mortal mind can


process. Without it, the Eye is noise."
Can we take it?
"You can. I will not stop you. But you


should understand what you are doing."
Why shouldn't we?
THE WARNING (deliver slowly):


"You take the tuner, but you do not know


the song. You are handing a match to a man


standing in oil."
Who wants it?
"You already know. You knew before you


came down here."
What is he?
"What remains when a mage asks one question


too many. I am the answer no one wanted."

THE MOVES
DAVINIA → THE CRYSTAL DECISION
Takes the Focal Crystal: → Containment field dissipates. Crystal is warm in her hands. → The Augur says nothing more. The blue light dims. → CONSEQUENCE: Tier 2 (Silent Academy) activates on the Dagon/Thalmor clock. Ancano gets what he wants. → Davinia has leverage to negotiate with Ancano topside. → Her immunity from the dossier is secured (for now).
Leaves the Crystal: → The Augur: "Wise. Or perhaps merely stubborn. Time will tell." → No Tier 2 activation. Ancano's offer expires. → The dossier stamp goes down. Future political consequence. → But Davinia keeps her integrity.
Asks the party what to do: → Let the table discuss. This is prime drama. Don't rush it. The party knows about the murders. They know the stakes. Every character can weigh in with their own perspective.
EXIT Crystal taken or left. Party continues exploring. → SCENE 10: Root Chamber.

SCENE 10: THE ROOT CHAMBER — DAGON'S TROJAN HORSE
━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━
Function: The Mystery. The mandatory path to the exit is blocked by a physical anomaly: a corrupted forest root deep in the frozen bedrock, flash-frozen by the Eye's defense mechanisms. It poses the question Hjolmar will answer later.
Location: The main tunnel leading to the drainage grate.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud)
─────────────────────
"The tunnel ahead—your path to the drainage grate—is partially
blocked. Bursting straight through the solid bedrock of the floor
and ceiling is a massive, black root, as thick as a wagon. It
weeps a dark, oily sap that smells of sulfur and rot.
But the root isn't moving. The front half of it, the tip reaching
toward the heavy blast doors of the inner vault, has been
flash-calcified. The ambient magic of the Midden has turned the
organic wood into perfectly smooth, translucent, geometric crystal.
Trapped inside that crystal, perfectly preserved like a fly in
amber, is a man wearing the crimson robes of the Mythic Dawn.
His face is frozen in a scream of absolute panic. In his hand,
embedded in the wood, is a carved sigil of Mehrunes Dagon."
Then improvise from: The air is freezing, but the black sap pooling on the floor is boiling. The crystal emits the same harsh, sterile blue light as the rest of the Midden. The cultist's robes are pristine, contrasting sharply with the ancient stone.
WHAT'S IN THIS ROOM
────────────────────
THE CRYSTALLIZED ROOT:
What they see: A massive, corrupted root turned to glass at the tip.
If they investigate: The root was growing toward the vault door.
The crystallization isn't natural ice; it is a magical defense
mechanism. The Midden's aura of perfect order violently rejected
the root's chaotic growth and petrified it.
Why planted here: The Question. What is a forest root doing under
the College, and why is Dagon using it?
THE PRESERVED CULTIST:
What they see: A Dagon cultist trapped inside the crystal root.
If investigate: He wasn't swallowed by the root; he was inside
it. He was piloting it, using the corrupted nature as a Trojan Horse
to bypass the College's magical wards until the ambient radiation
caught him.
Why planted here: Connects the Dagon Cult directly to the root system.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene 10 — the Root Chamber)
She sees the collision of two opposing physics engines.
The black root is a pulsing, chaotic mess of Dagonic intent: TEAR, BURN, UNMAKE.
The crystal encasing it is pure, blinding Magnus intent: STRUCTURE, HALT, PRESERVE.
She doesn't need a roll to understand the mechanics of the death. The cultist was trying to graft the root's chaotic energy directly into the Eye's containment field to hot-wire it. The Eye's automated defenses reacted to the incompatible math and flash-froze the intrusion.
CROWN REACTION: The Crown hums. Ismara is analytical and disgusted by the brute-force nature of the attempt. The whisper is sharp and condescending:
"A parasite trying to tap a god's vein. Ambition without the architecture to support it. The fool thought he could pilot a rotting log into a hurricane of pure logic. The Eye simply corrected the error."
SAIJAH'S REACTION (The Migraine):
The moment Saijah gets near the root, her psychic migraine flares agonizingly. She recognizes the specific, sickly resonance of the black sap. It's the exact same rot she felt at the Eldergleam Sanctuary.
The Revelation: The corruption didn't just stay in Eastmarch. It traveled underground. She doesn't know the full mechanics of the network yet, but she knows the rot she failed to stop has reached Winterhold.
EXIT
────
The party must squeeze past the crystallized root to reach the end of the tunnel.
→ SCENE 11: The Grate.


SCENE 11: THE GRATE — ESCAPE AND DESCENT

Function: The party escapes the Midden through a grate that drops them into the lower tunnels, leading to the Singing Sea and eventually Hjolmar's Forge. Location: A rusted iron grate in the floor of a drainage tunnel. Cold water running underneath.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The passage narrows into a drainage tunnel. Water runs along a channel cut into the floor, disappearing through a heavy iron grate. The grate is old — the bolts are corroded and the metal is thin with rust. Below it, you can hear the water falling a long way down. And something else — distant, rhythmic, almost musical. Like the mountain is singing."
Then improvise from: Rust smell. Cold water. The "singing" is faint but undeniable. The grate could be forced with a Might check or blasted with magic.
THE MOVES
OPENING THE GRATE: Might check (TN 14): Pry it open with brute force. → Success: Grate bends aside. Opening below. → Failure: Grate holds. Try again or use magic.
Magic: Any damage spell in the Hyper-Structure shatters it.
Lockpicking (TN 12): The hinges have a mechanism. Elegant solution.
THE DROP: 15-foot drop into a shallow pool. Agility roll (TN 10) to land cleanly. Failure: 2 damage, wet, embarrassed.
Below the grate: natural caves. Water channels. The singing is louder here. It's coming from ahead.
EXIT Party drops through the grate into the lower caves. → SCENE 12: The Singing Sea. 
SCENE 12: THE SINGING SEA — THE CROSSING
Function: A high-stakes physics setpiece. The party must cross a stretch of the Sea of Ghosts on a massive ice floe using Newtonian mechanics on frictionless ice. Not turn-based — the table acts collectively under time pressure. Three characters can act per obstacle. The scene rewards diversifying who acts and punishes repetition. The floe degrades with every failure. Kyboh's fix is on the other side.
Location: The base of the Winterhold plateau. The Sea of Ghosts stretches north. Black water, white ice, screaming wind. The Singing Glacier is visible across the strait — a blue-white spire that hums with a low, aching frequency. Hjolmar's Forge is inside it.

THE PHYSICS RULE
Read this to the table once. Repeat it when they forget.
The ice is frictionless. The tonal frequency from the Singing Glacier vibrates the sea ice at a molecular level. Nothing grips. Boots slide. Weapons skid. If you push something, it moves until it hits something else. If you push off something, YOU move until you hit something else.
Action equals reaction. Every force creates an opposite force. Jump off the back of the floe, the floe moves forward. Swing a weapon, the recoil slides you. Cast a spell with physical force, you skid backward. Fire an arrow, you drift.
You cannot steer mid-slide. Once moving, you move in a straight line until impact. The only people who break this rule: Saijah (air dash ignores terrain) and Davinia (can build ice structures to catch/redirect people).
The water is lethal. The Sea of Ghosts is black, near-freezing, and deep. Anyone who goes in takes 6 Cold damage immediately (irreducible) and must make a Hard (-2) Might check each round to stay afloat. Two failures and they sink. Rescue requires someone reaching the edge AND having a way to pull them out — on frictionless ice, reaching down to grab someone means you slide in after them.

THE FLOE
The party's raft. A slab of sea ice roughly 40 feet across. It was part of the frozen shore until they broke it free. It is their vehicle for the entire crossing.
Floe Integrity: 10 segments.
Every collision costs segments. Track this privately.
Glancing hit: -1 segment
Direct collision: -2 segments
Catastrophic impact: -3 segments
At 7 segments: Cracks visible. The floe groans.
At 5 segments: Noticeably smaller. Characters are crowded. Anyone who slides now has less room before they reach the edge. Read aloud: "The floe has lost nearly half its mass. You can see the water through the cracks. There is barely room for all five of you."
At 3 segments: Critical. Someone is standing on a piece that's about to break off. Any collision at this point risks splitting the floe in two with party members on both halves.
At 0 segments: The floe disintegrates. Everyone is in the water. This is a TPK scenario unless they can get onto debris within 2 rounds.

PHASE 1: DEAD STOP
Read aloud:
"You step out of the base of the plateau onto the frozen shore. The wind hits you like a door slamming. Ahead, the Sea of Ghosts — not frozen solid, but a chaos of ice and black water. Channels of open sea wind between massive floes. And across the strait, maybe half a mile out, the Singing Glacier. You can hear it from here. A low hum that you feel in your chest more than your ears.
At the shore's edge, a massive slab of sea ice sits half-grounded on the rocks. Forty feet across, flat, thick. It's connected to the shore by a thin bridge of frost. Beyond it — open water, then the maze of ice.
The moment you step onto the slab, you understand the problem. Your boots find nothing. No grip. No traction. You slide. Everything slides."
What happens: Let them experiment. Someone will try to walk and slide across the slab helplessly. Someone will fall. Someone will grab someone and they'll both slide. Let it be funny for two minutes. Let them discover the physics with their bodies.
The actual problem: How do you get this thing moving? The floe is grounded. They need to break it free from the shore and generate enough force to push it into open water.
Let them solve it. Do not suggest solutions. Possible approaches they might discover:
Kyboh braces against the shore rocks and pushes the floe with raw Might. He stays on shore and has to jump onto the moving floe before it drifts out of reach.
Alfonso uses force magic against the shoreline to push the whole slab.
Everyone stands at the shore-side edge and jumps backward off the edge simultaneously. Combined mass = combined force. But then they're all sliding across a frictionless deck toward the far edge.
Orion's horn. A sustained note directed at the shore could generate enough resonance to vibrate the floe free. He'd need to brace against something.
Davinia freezes the contact point between floe and shore, expands the ice, and cracks them apart. She reads the stress fractures to find the weakest point.
The moment the floe starts moving: It doesn't stop. Phase 2 begins immediately. They don't get to celebrate.
👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Phase 1): The ice beneath her feet isn't natural. Through the wizard eyes, the frictionless surface is a vibrating plane of tonal energy — the same kind of frequency she saw in Kyboh's bones. The glacier across the water is broadcasting it. She can see the resonance field saturating every ice surface.
She can also see the floe's structure — hairline fractures, density variations, weak points, strong points. She knows where it will break first if they hit something.
CROWN REACTION: Interest. Ismara recognizes tonal ice architecture. This is old. Older than the College. The whisper: "Someone built this. Long ago. The sea remembers."

PHASE 2: THE GAUNTLET
The floe is moving. It accelerates because there's no friction to slow it. Each obstacle appears with warning — Davinia sees it first with her wizard eyes, then everyone sees it. The table has SECONDS to respond. Three characters can act. Two are bracing, holding on, or helpless.
Pacing rule: Describe the obstacle. Give the table 30-60 real-world seconds to decide who does what. If they argue too long, the obstacle hits. This is not cruel — this is the frictionless ice demanding decisiveness. If they complain, remind them: "The ice doesn't wait."
Between obstacles, give them 1-2 minutes of calm. Let them talk, plan, catch their breath. Then the next one appears. The calm is part of the pacing. Tension comes from the contrast.

OBSTACLE 1: THE CHANNEL
Warning: "Dead ahead — the ice ends. A channel of open black water, thirty feet wide. The floe on the other side is lower. You're heading straight for the gap. You have seconds."
The problem: The floe will sail off the edge of the ice shelf into open water and sink nose-first. They need to either bridge the gap, jump the gap, redirect, or find a way to keep the floe floating across.
Three-action solutions might include:
Davinia freezes the water in the channel to create a bridge (FP cost — high)
Alfonso uses force magic to tilt the floe's leading edge upward so it ramps over the gap
Kyboh throws something massive off the front to slow their approach speed
Anyone who braces at the front acts as a counterweight
If they fail: The front edge dips into the channel. Black water floods across the front third of the deck. Anyone standing forward makes Agility TN 12 or they're ankle-deep and sliding toward the water. -1 segment. The floe survives but it's wet, cold, and people are hurt.
If they fail badly (nobody acts): The floe tips. Everyone slides toward the submerged front edge. Agility TN 14 or you're in the water. -2 segments. The floe rights itself but it's now barely moving and significantly smaller.

OBSTACLE 2: THE PILLAR
Warning: "A column of rock — volcanic basalt jutting from the sea floor, coated in ice. It's directly in your path and it's not moving. Davinia, you see it through the mist five seconds before anyone else."
The problem: Direct impact will crack the floe. They need to shatter the pillar, steer around it, or brake.
This obstacle rewards Orion. His horn is the perfect tool. A sustained resonant frequency aimed at an ice-coated basalt column could shatter the ice shell and potentially crack the rock itself. He wouldn't know this unless he tries.
Three-action solutions might include:
Orion aims the horn at the pillar and blasts a sustained note. Tonal engineering roll. If he hits the resonant frequency of the ice coating, the pillar explodes into fragments before they reach it.
Kyboh moves to the side of the floe and shoves off the pillar as they pass — redirecting both himself and the floe. Risk: he slides off the floe and has to be caught.
Davinia builds an ice wedge on the front of the floe to deflect off the pillar rather than hit it square. Turns a direct collision into a glancing blow.
Alfonso melts the base of the pillar with fire magic. Won't destroy it but might topple it before they arrive.
If they fail: Direct collision. Everyone makes Might TN 12 or gets knocked off their feet — and on frictionless ice, off your feet means sliding. The floe cracks audibly and changes direction. -2 segments. The floe is now spinning slowly, which makes the NEXT obstacle harder.
If Orion shatters the pillar: This is his moment. Describe it cinematically. The ice shell cracks in spirals. The basalt beneath splits. The fragments rain across the water around them as they glide through the debris field. The horn's note echoes off the glacier ahead. He just learned that tonal engineering works on the physical environment, not just on enchantments.
👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Obstacle 2): If Orion uses the horn, she sees the sound. Not metaphorically. The tonal wave is visible to her as a ripple in the resonance field saturating the ice. She can see it hit the pillar, find the harmonic frequency, and tear the structure apart from the inside. She has never seen tonal magic used this way before. It's not her domain — but she can SEE it.
If she tells Orion what she sees — "I can see the frequency, aim lower, the resonance is strongest at the base" — give him Advantage on the roll.

OBSTACLE 3: THE CALVING
Warning: No warning. A massive section of glacier wall ahead shears off and crashes into the sea. A wave — not huge, but on frictionless ice, any wave is a disaster.
The problem: The wave hits the underside of the floe and tilts it violently. Everyone slides toward one edge. The floe rocks like a boat in a storm. This isn't about steering — it's about not falling off.
This obstacle rewards Saijah. Her air dash ignores terrain. While everyone else is sliding helplessly across a tilting frictionless surface, she can move freely. She is the rescue unit.
Three-action solutions might include:
Saijah air-dashes to whoever is closest to the edge and grabs them. She's the only one who can reach them in time.
Davinia builds a wall on the low edge to catch sliding characters. If she can see the wave coming (wizard eyes), she gets an extra second to prepare.
Anyone with a rope can anchor to something. But there's nothing to anchor TO on frictionless ice unless Davinia freezes an anchor point into the surface.
Kyboh — heavy, strong — can plant himself as a human wall for someone to crash into instead of sliding off the edge.
If they fail: Someone goes off the edge. Into the water. 6 irreducible cold damage, Might TN 14 (-2) to stay afloat. The floe tilts back but the edge where they fell off cracks away. -1 segment. Now they have a person in the water and a floe that's drifting away from them.
Rescuing someone from the water on frictionless ice: This is almost impossible alone. Reaching down to grab someone means you slide in after them. Solutions: Saijah air-dashes to the edge and grabs them (she can hold position). Davinia builds an ice ramp from the water to the deck. Two people form a chain — one holds the other's legs while they reach down. Alfonso uses telekinetic magic to lift them out.

OBSTACLE 4: THE DRIFT
Warning: "The current is pulling you sideways. Not toward the glacier — toward the open ocean. Davinia, you can feel it through the floe. The tonal field is weaker here. The ice under you is starting to grip — which means your floe is slowing AND drifting west. You're going to miss the glacier entirely."
The problem: They're losing momentum and going off course. They need to generate thrust in a specific direction. This is a callback to Phase 1 — but now they're mid-sea with no shore to push off of.
This obstacle rewards Alfonso. Raw magical force aimed in the right direction. Magic 19 means he can generate significant thrust. But he needs to aim precisely or he makes it worse.
Three-action solutions might include:
Alfonso fires a sustained force spell off the east side of the floe to push them west-to-north. Magic roll for precision.
Kyboh runs to the east edge and jumps off. His body mass at 30mph pushes the floe west. But now Kyboh is in the water or on another floe and has to get back. Heroic and stupid — exactly what his player would do.
Orion uses the horn to vibrate the ice beneath them back to frictionless, restoring their speed. Tonal engineering roll — he's fighting against the weakening resonance field.
Davinia reads the tonal field with her eyes and finds the "current" — the direction the resonance is strongest. She can tell them which way to aim.
If they fail: The floe drifts off course. They pass the glacier. Now they have to figure out how to get BACK, which means generating force in a new direction with a smaller, damaged floe. No segment loss, but they add 2 more obstacles to their crossing as they correct course.

OBSTACLE 5: THE COLLISION
Warning: "Another floe. Bigger than yours. Moving perpendicular to your path. It's going to hit your port side in about ten seconds. There's no room to dodge. It's massive."
The problem: Physics problem. A larger mass hits a smaller mass. They need to either destroy the incoming floe, reinforce their floe, redirect the incoming floe's path, or ride the collision.
This obstacle is the hardest. It may require all five acting.
Three-action solutions might include:
Orion aims the horn at the incoming floe and tries to crack it into smaller pieces before impact. If he succeeds, they take scattered fragment hits instead of one massive collision.
Davinia builds a reinforced ice wall on the contact side to absorb impact. She can see exactly where the collision will happen.
Alfonso generates a force barrier or redirects the incoming floe with a massive push spell. Magic 19 means he CAN do this but the FP cost is brutal.
Kyboh braces on the impact side as a human shock absorber. He takes damage but reduces the collision force on the floe.
Saijah positions herself to grab whoever gets knocked loose.
If they partially succeed (2-3 good actions): Glancing blow. The incoming floe scrapes along their side, shearing off a strip. Everyone on that side makes Agility TN 12. -1 segment. The grinding sound is horrible. Ice dust fills the air.
If they fail: Direct broadside. The floe cracks down the middle. -3 segments. If the floe was already at 5 or below, it SPLITS. Half the party on each piece. The two halves drift apart. They must reconnect or one group reaches the glacier while the other doesn't.
The split scenario: This is the most dramatic thing that can happen. Two groups, two pieces of ice, drifting apart. Saijah can air-dash between them. Ropes can connect them. Alfonso can pull them together magically. But for a few terrible seconds, the party is divided on open water.

OBSTACLE 6: THE FOG
Warning: None for most of the party. The blizzard thickens into whiteout fog. Visibility drops to five feet. They can't see what's ahead.
The problem: They can't steer if they can't see. But Davinia CAN see. Her wizard eyes don't rely on visible light — she sees magical architecture, tonal fields, aura. The ice, the obstacles, the glacier — all visible to her through the fog as patterns of energy.
This is entirely Davinia's obstacle. She has to call directions while blind teammates execute. She is the eyes. They are the hands.
Three-action solutions might include:
Davinia stands at the front and calls out obstacles as she sees them through the tonal field. She becomes the navigator.
The other two actions are whatever she calls for — "WALL LEFT, ALFONSO NOW" or "KYBOH BRACE FRONT, SOMETHING BIG"
Orion can use the horn as sonar — sustained tones that bounce off obstacles and return. He can hear what's ahead even if he can't see it. If Davinia directs and Orion confirms, the party navigates blind.
If they fail (Davinia doesn't step up or calls wrong): They hit something unseen. Whatever it was, it wasn't huge — but hitting something you never saw is terrifying. -1 segment. The fog clears in a few minutes either way. But the psychological damage is done. The table knows they need Davinia's eyes.
If Davinia navigates perfectly: She sees the path through the fog as a clear channel of tonal resonance threading between obstacles. She walks them through it with precise, calm instructions. The Crown approves. The whisper is warm: "You see the way. You always did." That's the trap — the Crown making her feel powerful, needed, irreplaceable. Making the new eyes feel like a gift instead of a leash.
👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Obstacle 6 — the fog): While everyone else is blind, she sees everything. Not in color or light — in structure. The ice is a lattice of glowing tonal lines. The obstacles are dark masses. The glacier ahead is a blazing beacon. The water is a void. Her friends are fragile halos of warmth on a field of cold geometry.
This is the most Ismara she has ever felt. This is how Ismara saw the world. Architecture. Systems. Not people — structures to protect or discard.
If she says something kind to a teammate while navigating — "You're doing great, stay left" — the Crown goes quiet. If she says something cold and efficient — "Move. Now. Left." — the Crown hums with approval.

OBSTACLE 7: THE SHALLOWS
Warning: "The water is getting lighter. Not clearer — shallower. Davinia, you can see the seafloor through the ice. There are rocks down there. Lots of them. Just barely submerged. You're going to run aground."
The problem: The floe is about to beach itself on submerged rocks. If it hits at speed, it shatters on the rocks. They need to slow down or lift the floe over the shallows.
This obstacle forces resource management. By now, Davinia's FP should be running low from building ice structures. Alfonso has been casting. Kyboh has been brute-forcing. The table has to decide who has enough left to act.
Three-action solutions might include:
Alfonso melts the ice on the underside of the floe at the front, creating a sloped hull that rides up over the rocks instead of hitting them flat.
Davinia freezes the shallow water solid ahead of them, creating an ice ramp over the rocks. This costs a LOT of FP.
Kyboh runs to the back and drags his feet (or his hands) off the trailing edge into the water to create drag. Painful — the water is lethal cold. He takes damage voluntarily.
Orion uses the horn at low frequency aimed downward to vibrate the rocks into sand. Ambitious, but tonal engineering could do it.
If they fail: The floe grinds onto rocks. Horrible scraping sound. Everyone slides forward as the floe decelerates violently. Might TN 14 to stay standing. -2 segments from the bottom being torn up. The floe is now stuck. They have to push off the rocks to get moving again, which is a mini Phase-1 repeat with a smaller, damaged raft.

PHASE 3: THE WALL
This triggers when the glacier fills their entire field of vision.
Read aloud:
"The Singing Glacier is close. Close enough that you can see individual textures in the ice — ancient, compressed, blue as sapphire. Close enough that the humming vibration is making your vision blur. Close enough that you realize you are moving very, very fast toward a wall of solid ice that has been here since before humans walked Tamriel.
You are going to hit it. You are going to hit it HARD. And the floe you're standing on has been cracking and shrinking for the last ten minutes.
You can see, set into the glacier face about thirty feet up, a dark opening. A cave. That's where you need to be. But right now you need to NOT BE DEAD."
The problem: Stop the floe. Everyone acts. This is not a three-action limit — this is all hands on deck.
The math: Privately, assess how much speed they have. If they handled the gauntlet well (avoided most obstacles, still have momentum), they need MORE braking force. If they scraped through (hit everything, low speed), they need less. Scale the difficulty to make it tight but survivable.
What each character can contribute:
Davinia: Freeze the water ahead of the floe into a crumple zone. Thick ice that their floe crashes into and compresses rather than hitting the glacier directly. Alternatively, build an ice ramp that redirects their momentum upward toward the cave mouth. The ramp is harder but gets them where they need to go.


Kyboh: Run to the front of the floe and push against the glacier wall as they approach. He's the human brake pad. This will hurt him. He takes damage. But his Might can absorb some of the impact.


Alfonso: Reverse thrust. Everything he's got, aimed forward, pushing them back. This is the biggest spell he's cast all crossing.


Orion: Resonance brake. If the glacier is singing, it has a frequency. The horn can match it, creating constructive interference that pushes back against their momentum. Or destructive interference that cancels the vibration in the ice ahead, making it grippy — restoring friction right before impact.


Saijah: She can't brake the floe. But she can save people. When the impact happens — and it WILL happen, even if they brake — people will fly forward off the floe. She air-dashes and catches them. Or she air-dashes to the cave mouth BEFORE impact and drops a rope.


Resolution:
If they brake successfully (4-5 contributions): The floe grinds to a halt against the glacier base. The impact is rough but survivable. No one goes into the water. The floe is done — cracked, fractured, barely holding together. They step off onto the glacier's ice shelf. They made it.
If they partially brake (2-3 contributions): The floe hits the glacier at reduced speed. It cracks in half. Everyone takes 4 bludgeoning damage from impact. Characters on the front half are dumped onto the glacier shelf. Characters on the back half are on a sinking chunk of ice that's pulling away from the wall. They have one round to get off it — jump, rope, Saijah's air dash, climb.
If they fail to brake (0-1 contributions): The floe detonates against the glacier. 8 bludgeoning damage to everyone. Everyone is in the water, in the rubble, against the glacier wall. They need to climb out of lethal water onto the ice shelf. Everyone makes Might TN 14 (-2) or Agility TN 14 to find a handhold. Saijah can air-dash out freely. This is survivable but EXPENSIVE — they arrive at Hjolmar's door bruised, freezing, and humbled.
No matter what: They make it to the glacier. The question is what condition they're in when they arrive. The crossing should cost them something — FP, HP, dignity — but not their lives. Hjolmar's forge is inside. They didn't come this far to drown.
👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Phase 3 — the glacier wall): The glacier is the brightest thing she has ever seen with her new eyes. The entire structure is saturated with ancient tonal energy — millennia of compressed sound and cold and time, layered into the ice like rings in a tree. The humming isn't random. It's language. Ice atronach language, the same script she saw on the Midden walls, but older. Much older. This glacier has been singing the same sentence since before the Dragon War.
She can't read it yet. Not the whole thing. But she catches one word, repeated, embedded in every layer of ancient ice:
PRESERVE.
CROWN REACTION: The Crown doesn't whisper. It SINGS. A single, clear note that harmonizes with the glacier's hum. Ismara is home. This is her architecture. Her ice. Her language. For one terrible, beautiful moment, Davinia doesn't know where she ends and Ismara begins.

GM REFERENCE: OBSTACLE ROTATION TRACKER
Use this to make sure you're diversifying who acts.
Obstacle
Primary Characters
Who SHOULD Rest
1: Channel
Davinia (bridge), Alfonso (tilt), Kyboh (brake)
Orion, Saijah
2: Pillar
Orion (horn), Davinia (wedge), Kyboh (redirect)
Alfonso, Saijah
3: Calving
Saijah (rescue), Davinia (wall), Kyboh (brace)
Alfonso, Orion
4: Drift
Alfonso (thrust), Orion (resonance), Davinia (navigate)
Kyboh, Saijah
5: Collision
ALL FIVE — this is the crisis point
Nobody rests
6: Fog
Davinia (navigate), Orion (sonar), whoever she calls
Varies
7: Shallows
Alfonso (reshape), Kyboh (drag), Orion (vibrate)
Davinia, Saijah
WALL
ALL FIVE
Nobody rests

This is a suggestion, not a script. Your players will surprise you. If Saijah comes up with a brilliant solution to the Pillar that nobody expected, let her do it. The rotation is a safety net, not a cage.

GM NOTES
Pacing: The whole crossing should take 30-45 minutes. Phase 1 is the longest (5-10 min of experimentation). Each obstacle in Phase 2 is 3-5 minutes. Phase 3 is 5-8 minutes.
Don't roll for everything. If their solution is clever and makes physical sense, it works. Roll only when the outcome is genuinely uncertain or when failure is interesting.
The floe tracker is your throttle. If they're handling it too easily, make the next collision cost more segments. If they're struggling, let a clever solution restore a segment — Davinia freezes new ice onto the edges, Alfonso fuses a smaller floe to theirs.
Let them fail forward. Every failure makes the crossing harder but doesn't end it. The floe gets smaller. People are hurt. Resources are drained. But they keep moving toward the glacier. The only way to actually die is to stop trying.
Kyboh's gloves: His ceramic fused gloves are a liability AND an asset here. The psychic static is agonizing near the glacier. But the gloves respond to tonal frequencies — on frictionless tonal ice, his punches have MORE force than normal, not less. He's dangerous to himself and to the floe. Let his player feel that.
This scene has no enemies. The ice is the enemy. The physics is the enemy. The clock is the enemy. If you add combat (wraiths, sea creatures), it dilutes the purity of the challenge. The whole point is that they're fighting Newton, not monsters.

EXIT
They stand at the base of the glacier. The cave mouth is above them — reachable by climbing the ice shelf or, if Davinia built the ramp in Phase 3, by simply walking up.
Inside the cave: warmth. Geothermal heat from deep in the earth. The singing stops. The ice gives way to stone. And deeper in, the sound of a hammer on an anvil. Kybohs enchanted items start glowing. The 3 ice sigils light up corresponding to three identical ones on the wall and the wall opens.
→ SCENE 13: HJOLMAR'S FORGE.


SCENE 13: HJOLMAR'S FORGE — THE BONE REVELATION (FINAL)

Function: The most important non-combat scene in the module. Every party member gains something real. Kyboh gets his diagnosis and the Anchor. Orion learns a new application of tonal engineering. Alfonso receives a terrifying diagnosis of his own. Saijah gains strategic intelligence about the Dagon cult and the Eldergleam network. Davinia meets someone who knew Ismara personally — and watches two ancient geniuses bicker while her skull is the disputed territory. Delivers the Mzinchaleft quest hook and the final choice.
Location: A hidden forge inside the Singing Glacier. Geothermal heat. Dwemer tools. The sound of a waterfall. Ancient, maintained, lived-in.
Emotional Arc — KYBOH (GM reference):
Angry — "You broke my masterpiece"
Alarmed — "Your bones are enchanted, you should be dead"
Confused — "Why aren't you dead?"
Testing — tuning forks, tonal examination, five minutes of silence
Realization — discovery he hides from the room
Urgent — Anchor of Stasis, immediate preservation
Controlled — quest hook, carefully hiding how much he needs Kyboh

THE ROOM (Read Aloud)
"The caves open into a space that shouldn't exist this deep — a forge. Not College-made. Older. Dwemer pipes run along the ceiling, still carrying heat from somewhere far below. A stone anvil sits at the center, and the walls are lined with tools that look like they were designed for surgery as much as smithing. A waterfall cascades down the far wall into a basin that glows faintly — geothermal, heated by the mountain itself.
And standing at the anvil, arms folded, looking at you like he's been expecting you for a week, is Hjolmar."
Then improvise from: Heat. The smell of hot metal and mineral water. Steam from the geothermal basin. The forge is well-maintained — someone lives here. Tools are organized with military precision. This man is enormous — tall, broad, built like a wall. Nord, but something about his proportions is slightly off. Slightly too large. Alfonso gave up sensation of saitedness in exchange for enchanting the jagged crown to be a daedric object of namira. We must design it. 

THE PEOPLE
HJOLMAR ICE-SHAPER Voice: Gruff. Direct. No wasted words. Nord accent, but educated. His tone SHIFTS during this scene — track it carefully. Body language: Arms folded → grabs wrist → runs to tools → stillness → urgency → laughter (when he sees the Crown). Attitude: Starts as a disappointed master craftsman. Ends as a man reunited with an old colleague and sitting on the discovery of his lifetime.
Physical note (GM eyes only): Hjolmar's current body is a giant's body. He transferred his consciousness into it using soul gem interface crystals — living symbiotic formations that allow his mind to interface with biology. He has been doing this for millennia, hopping between vessels. Giants are descended from the same Atmoran stock as Nords — same species, diverged lineage. Nobody notices when a giant goes missing from the wilds. His current form passes as an unusually large Nord. The proportions are just slightly wrong if you look closely. Nobody ever looks closely.
Opening line: "Take those off. Now. Let me see."

THE MOVES

BEAT 1: THE ANGRY CRAFTSMAN
Hjolmar takes Kyboh's hands. Examines the fused ceramic. His expression darkens.
Read aloud:
"He turns your hands over, pressing his thumbs into the grey ceramic where it meets your skin. His face tightens. Not with concern for you — with grief for the gloves.
'I gave you a Stradivarius, and you used it as a battering ram. These gloves use Tonal Architecture. They store and replicate kinetic force through harmonic resonance. You created a feedback loop. A dissonant chord that shattered the enchantment at its source. The soul-matrix is fused. The harmonic channels are burnt out. You took my art, my symphony, and you turned it into noise.'
He lets go of your hands. His voice is flat with disappointment.
'I should send you away. Let you live with what you've done.'"
Let this land. Let Kyboh's player sit in it. Hjolmar is genuinely angry. This is a master watching vandalism.
Then:
"'But I won't. Because I built those gloves, and I don't leave my work unfinished. Hold still.'"

BEAT 2: THE DISCOVERY
Hjolmar strikes a tuning fork against the anvil and presses it to the surface of the ceramic gloves.
Read aloud:
"The tuning fork rings — a clean, precise note. The ceramic cracks. Then shatters. The gloves fall away in pieces, clattering on the stone floor like broken pottery.
The psychic static doesn't stop. It gets LOUDER.
You look down at your bare hands. The skin is raw, but it is vibrating. Your fingers blur slightly, humming with a frequency you can feel in your teeth. Hjolmar grabs your wrist again — hard this time — and his expression changes.
Not anger anymore. Alarm.
'That's not residue. That's not echo. The tonal matrix — it didn't just burn the gloves. It went INTO you. The kinetic pressure forced the enchantment through the ceramic and into your marrow.'
He pulls your arm closer, staring at your hand like he's reading something written in your bones.
'Your skeleton is enchanted. The Titan's Tithe is in your bones. You are a walking tuning fork, and without the heavy ceramic of those gloves to cap the resonance...'"
He trails off. His brow furrows. He's doing math in his head.
"'...your bones should be vibrating themselves to dust right now. You should have been dead before you walked through my door.'"
He looks at your face for the first time. Not your hands. Your face.
"'Why aren't you dead?'"
Kyboh will not have a good answer. He doesn't take things seriously. Whatever he says, Hjolmar ignores it and moves to the next beat.

BEAT 3: THE TESTS
Hjolmar goes quiet. He walks to his tool wall, pulls down three different tuning forks — different sizes, different metals. He comes back.
Read aloud:
"He doesn't explain what he's doing. He strikes the first fork and holds it to Kyboh's sternum. Listens. His eyes narrow.
He strikes the second fork. Holds it to the back of Kyboh's skull. Listens longer this time. His lips move — he's counting something.
He strikes the third fork — the largest, a deep bass note that you feel more than hear. He holds it to the center of Kyboh's chest and closes his eyes.
The silence stretches. Ten seconds. Twenty. The rest of the party can see Hjolmar's hand trembling. Not from strain. From something else.
He opens his eyes. He sets the fork down very carefully, as if it might break.
He walks to the far wall. Pulls out a different instrument — something that looks like a stethoscope made of brass and crystal. Comes back. Places it against Kyboh's chest. Listens again.
He takes it off. Puts it back. Comes back with a THIRD device — a flat crystal plate that he presses to Kyboh's palm. The plate glows. He studies it.
Then he does the whole sequence again. All three instruments. From the top."
Let this silence build. The party has been standing here watching for five minutes. Hjolmar has not said a word since "why aren't you dead."
If a party member interrupts — "What's going on?" or "Is he okay?" — Hjolmar holds up one finger without looking away from Kyboh. Finishes his examination.
Then:
"He takes a step back. Looks at Kyboh. Really looks at him. The disappointment is gone. The anger is gone. Something else is in his face now — something the party has never seen on a gruff, practical craftsman.
Reverence. Quickly buried. But it was there.
'Sit down,' he says. His voice is different. Quieter. Careful. 'Sit down right now. Don't move. Don't punch anything. Don't flex. Don't even clench your fists. I need to get you something and I need you to be absolutely still until I do.'"
ORION — THE MOMENT (see full section below). If Orion was watching Hjolmar's examination carefully, this is when the realization hits him. See "What Each Character Gains" at the end.

BEAT 4: THE ANCHOR
Hjolmar moves fast. He goes to a locked chest behind the anvil — locked with THREE mechanisms, not one. He opens it and produces a heavy, dull-grey collar made of an unknown lead-like metal.
Read aloud:
"He brings it to Kyboh and locks it around his neck without asking permission. The moment the collar closes —
Silence.
Real silence. The psychic static that has been screaming in Kyboh's skull since the gloves fused — gone. The vibration in his hands — gone. The buzzing in his teeth — gone. For the first time in weeks, there is nothing. Just quiet.
The collar is oppressively heavy. It feels like gravity doubled around your chest and shoulders. But the silence is the most beautiful thing you've heard in your life.
Hjolmar watches you like a man who just caught a falling vase.
'The Anchor of Stasis. It suppresses all tonal and enchantment activity in your body. Everything. The bone enchantment, external enchantments, enemy enchantments — all of it. Silent. Dead. You are magically deaf while you wear that. But you are also alive, which is the more pressing concern right now.'"
⚔️ ANCHOR OF STASIS — PERMANENT EQUIPMENT (until quest)
IMMUNE to ALL Enchantments and Tonal Magic — friendly AND hostile. This includes: Bard buffs/debuffs, enchanted weapon magical properties, tonal effects of any kind, enemy enchantment effects.
CANNOT wear or benefit from enchanted weapons, armor, or jewelry. Enchanted items are inert on his person.
Enchanted weapon hits against him: Physical damage applies. Magical properties (e.g., +2 Fire, Paralysis) are nullified — both from allies and enemies.
Raw spellcasting still affects him normally. (Fireball hurts. Enchanted sword's fire doesn't.)

BEAT 5: THE EXPLANATION
Hjolmar pulls up a stool. Sits across from Kyboh. His tone is completely different now — patient, precise, almost gentle.
Read aloud:
"'Let me tell you what I found. Listen, because I will not repeat myself.
The Titan's Tithe — the doubling enchantment in your gloves — did not burn out. It migrated. When you overloaded the ceramic, the tonal matrix had nowhere to go except inward. Through the ceramic. Through your skin. Into your marrow. Your skeleton is now the enchantment.
This is not a curse. This is, objectively, better than what you had. The gloves were external. Fragile. Limited by their ceramic housing. What you have now is innate. Permanent. Part of you the way your heartbeat is part of you. You could wear other enchanted gauntlets on top of this and they would stack. The old ceiling has been removed.
But.'
He holds up a finger.
'The gloves had a ceramic housing that absorbed the blowback. Your bones do not. Every time you activate the Tithe — every time you double your force — the resonance feeds back through your skeleton.
The first use: one point of irreducible damage. Tolerable. The second: two. The third: four. Then eight. Sixteen. Thirty-two. Sixty-four.
It doubles every time. Cumulative within a single engagement. The tenth use would kill a giant. The fifteenth would crack a mountain. And every point of that damage goes through your bones first.
THAT is what the Anchor prevents. While you wear it, the Tithe is dormant. Silent. You cannot use it, but it cannot kill you. Without the Anchor, you are the most dangerous man in Skyrim and you are dying simultaneously.
What you need is not a suppressor. What you need is a regulator. Something that lets you CHOOSE when the Tithe activates and channels the blowback through a medium that can absorb it — the way the ceramic used to, but better. Stronger. Built for what you are now, not what you were.'
He pauses.
'I can build that. A new gauntlet. But I need a component I don't have. The Aetherial Matrix. Dwemer-made. It stabilizes any harmonic frequency. There's one in Mzinchaleft, in the Pale. Deep inside. Guarded by something old and very much still running.
Bring it to me. I will forge you something worthy of what you've become.'"

BEAT 6: KYBOH'S QUESTIONS
Question
Hjolmar's Answer
"What did you find during the tests? Why so many?"
Long pause. "Your resonance signature is unusual. The bone enchantment should have been instantly fatal. That it wasn't tells me your body has a tolerance for tonal stress I've never seen in another living person. I needed to confirm before I put the Anchor on. If I was wrong, the Anchor would have killed you instead."
"What does 'unusual' mean?"
"It means you are either very lucky or very old. Possibly both. I have questions I'm not ready to ask yet. Get me the Matrix first."
"Can I use the Tithe right now if I take the Anchor off?"
"You can. And the first use will cost you one hit point. And the second will cost two. And the third four. And you'll feel invincible right up until the moment your ribcage liquefies. Keep the Anchor on."
"What will the new gauntlet do?"
"It will let you use the Tithe at will. Store the force. Choose when to release it. The gauntlet absorbs the blowback instead of your bones — up to a point. Push past that point and the gauntlet won't save you. Nothing will."
"Will it be better than the old gloves?"
"The old gloves doubled your force once per kill. The new gauntlet will let you STACK it. Kill after kill, building pressure. You decide when to release. But there is a ceiling, and beyond that ceiling is a detonation that will level everything in forty feet. Including you. Including your friends. That is the price of innate power — the ceiling is higher but so is the fall."
"Why do you care?"
Almost says something. Stops. "I built those gloves. I finish what I start. That's all you need to know right now."
"What are you not telling me?"
"Many things. Earn them."


BEAT 7: THE CROWN
This fires when Hjolmar's attention drifts from Kyboh to the rest of the party — specifically when he notices Davinia.
He sees the Crown of the Pale Lady fused to her skull. He stops talking mid-sentence. Stares. And then — a sound nobody expected.
He laughs.
Read aloud:
"Hjolmar is looking at Davinia. Not at her — at the Crown. His eyes go wide, then narrow, and then he laughs. A real laugh. Deep, rumbling, genuinely amused.
'Oh, you stupid, stubborn woman. I TOLD you.'
He's not talking to Davinia. He's talking to the Crown.
'You distributed your entire cognitive load across a monolithic permafrost lattice. A SINGLE housing. And you're SURPRISED when the transfer collapses and locks you in? I told you at the symposium. I told you to your face. Use vessels. Use REPLACEABLE vessels. But no. Ismara had to be elegant. Ismara had to be permanent. And now look at you — you're a hat.'"
CROWN REACTION — read to Davinia's player privately:
The Crown goes warm. Not hostile warm. Not possessive warm. Something Davinia hasn't felt before. Amusement. Ismara is amused.
The whisper is sharper than usual, clearer, as if proximity to Hjolmar is giving her more bandwidth:
"Tell the old fossil his 'replaceable vessels' are why he's wearing a body two sizes too large. At least I kept my figure."
If Davinia relays this (or any version of it):
Hjolmar laughs harder.
"'She can hear me? Good. Tell her I'm on my sixth body and every single one of them had working legs. How's the immobility treating you, Ismara?'"
This can continue for as long as Davinia is willing to relay messages. The dynamic is old colleagues ribbing each other. Two people who were at the cutting edge of consciousness transfer technology thousands of years ago, who chose different paths, and one of them is clearly vindicated while the other is fused to a mortal's skull. Hjolmar finds this genuinely funny. Ismara pretends to find it funny but underneath is the sting of knowing he was right.
What Hjolmar will tell Davinia directly (when the teasing stops):
"I know what that crown is. I know who's inside it. Ismara and I worked together before the Dragon War. Same research. Same goal — preserve consciousness beyond mortal death. She chose ice. One structure. Permanent. Irreversible. I chose symbiotic crystal interfaces. Transferable. Repairable. She called my method inelegant. I called hers a death trap. We were both right.
The crown is fused to your skull. That's not an accident — that's her methodology. Monolithic integration. She can't exist without you now, and the longer she's in there, the more of you she replaces with herself. I can't remove it. No one can. The interface is biological now.
But you can know what she is. She's not a goddess. She's not a demon. She's a researcher who got trapped in her own experiment four thousand years ago and is now trying to complete it using your body as a second attempt. Everything she whispers to you — the protection, the power, the sight — those are tools. Her tools. She is building her laboratory inside your head.
Whether you let her finish is your problem. But now you know what the problem actually is.'"
CROWN REACTION to this speech:
Silence. Not the warm silence of approval. Not the cold silence of disapproval. The silence of someone who has been accurately described by a person who knows them better than anyone alive.
Then, very quietly: "He was always like this. Insufferable and correct."

BEAT 8: THE REST OF THE PARTY
After the Kyboh examination and the Ismara conversation, Hjolmar is in a talkative mood. He's had the best day he's had in centuries. He's willing to answer questions and make observations. Each party member can gain something real from this interaction.
ALFONSO — THE DISCORDANT SONG
This doesn't require Alfonso to ask. Hjolmar is a tonal genius. He hears things the way a concert pianist hears a broken string in an orchestra. At some point — while working on Kyboh, while talking to Ismara, while doing literally anything — he pauses. Turns his head slightly toward Alfonso. Frowns.
Read aloud:
"Hjolmar stops mid-sentence. He looks at Alfonso — not with concern, but with the professional curiosity of a man who just heard an off note.
'You. The mage. Come here.'
He doesn't touch Alfonso. Doesn't examine him. Just stands near him for a moment, head tilted, listening to something no one else can hear.
'Two songs. Playing at once. In the same body. They're fighting for the same frequency and neither one is winning.'
He steps back.
'Find the harmony or the dissonance tears you apart. That's not a metaphor. Your soul is vibrating at two incompatible frequencies. I don't know what you did to yourself, but you have months, not years, to resolve it. Maybe less. I'd work quickly.'"
He doesn't explain further. He doesn't offer to help. This is not his area — he's a tonal architect, not a physician. He can hear the problem. He cannot fix it. But he's just given Alfonso the most accurate diagnosis anyone has ever provided: two patrons, two frequencies, find the harmony or die.
If Alfonso asks what the two songs are:
"I hear what I hear. One is old and slow and hungry. The other is old and fast and rotting. They want the same space inside you and they can't both have it. That's all I can tell you. The rest is your business."
SAIJAH — THE DAGON INTELLIGENCE
This fires if anyone brings up the Root Chamber — the Dagon cultist preserved in the Eldergleam root (Scene 10). If nobody brings it up, Hjolmar might notice something about the party's gear or residual magical signatures and ask: "You came through the Midden. You found the root chamber. I can smell the sap on your boots. What did you see?"
When the party describes the cultist and the incomplete planar anchor:
Read aloud:
"Hjolmar goes still. The humor drains from his face.
'A Mythic Dawn operative. Inside the College. Carving a planar anchor into an Eldergleam root. That confirms what I've suspected for a long time.'
He walks to a wall and pulls down a rolled piece of hide. Unfurls it on a workbench. It's a map of Skyrim, but not a normal map. It shows root systems. A vast network of lines spreading from a central point — the Eldergleam Sanctuary near Whiterun — to every corner of the province.
'The Eldergleam's root system spans all of Skyrim. It's not a tree. It's an immune system. A living network that detects and contains planar intrusion — Daedric influence trying to push through the barriers between Oblivion and Nirn. Every root is a sensor and a seal. When Dagon's people try to open a door, the nearest root grows around it and holds it shut. That's what you saw in the Midden. The root trapped the cultist mid-ritual because the tree felt the intrusion and responded.
But the roots are dying. The network is weakening. Not from age — from attack. The Dagon cult isn't just trying to open portals. They're trying to kill the immune system first. Poison the roots. Blight the network. Cut the tree's ability to respond. And once enough roots are dead, the doors open and nothing holds them shut.
The plague in Riften? Ask yourselves what's near Riften. What grows near Riften. The cult doesn't need to open a portal in the city. They just need to kill the root that's protecting it.'"
He rolls the map back up.
"'Your priestess — Danica? She's on the right track if she's heading for the Eldergleam. The tree is where this war is won or lost. Not on battlefields. In the root system. Protect the roots, you protect the province. Lose them, and Dagon doesn't need an army. He just walks in through a thousand open doors.'"
This gives Saijah (and the party) the strategic picture: The Eldergleam is Skyrim's immune system. The Dagon cult is systematically attacking it. Danica's quest to reach the Eldergleam is not a side mission — it's the central front of a war nobody else can see. Saijah's connection to Kynareth, her role as the naturalist, her revulsion at corruption — all of it now has a strategic framework. She knows what she's fighting and why it matters.
ORION — THE DIAGNOSTIC SONG
This isn't a conversation with Hjolmar. It's a realization that happens in Orion's head while watching the examination.
Run this during or shortly after Beat 3 (The Tests):
Orion watches Hjolmar use tuning forks to diagnose Kyboh. He watches a tonal engineer use sound to read the interior of a living person — their enchantments, their physical integrity, their hidden structure. Hjolmar doesn't cast a spell. He doesn't use magic. He strikes a fork, listens, and knows.
Orion uses a horn. He's been using sound as a weapon — shattering pillars, creating resonance. But he's never considered that the same instrument could read instead of break.
To Orion's player (privately or at the table, your call):
"You're watching Hjolmar work, and something clicks. He's not using magic. He's using acoustics. He strikes a frequency, and the body resonates back — and the resonance TELLS him things. The pitch, the duration, the harmonics, the interference patterns. He's reading Kyboh like a book, and his instrument is a tuning fork.
You have a horn. A horn is a tuning fork you aim.
You could do this."
New ability gained through observation:
⚔️ DIAGNOSTIC SONG — New Tonal Ability (Orion)
Orion plays a sustained, focused note aimed at a single target. Tonal Engineering roll required.
Success: He learns the target's current HP/FP totals AND one unique ability or trait (GM's choice which one is revealed — always the most tactically relevant).
Exceptional Success: He also detects hidden conditions — poison, enchantment, transformation, possession, anything with a tonal signature.
This works on anything with a physical form. People, creatures, constructs, enchanted objects. It does NOT work on incorporeal beings or things without resonance (Void Atronachs, for example, would return silence).
Limitation: The target hears the note. It is not subtle. Using this in social situations or on allies without consent is a choice with consequences.

GM NOTES — WHAT HJOLMAR KNOWS (DO NOT REVEAL)
Hjolmar discovered during the tonal tests that Kyboh has a multi-layered soul structure — not one resonant frequency but several, overlapping, harmonizing with each other. This is why the bone enchantment didn't kill him. A normal person has one soul frequency. The tonal matrix targeted one and should have destroyed him, but the others held. The matrix is now anchored across multiple frequencies simultaneously — more stable than the old gloves ever were.
Hjolmar recognizes this signature. He has been looking for it — for someone whose soul could survive the tonal stress of the Echo Mimic. He has been searching for GENERATIONS. Every glove, every gauntlet, every tonal weapon he has ever built was a prototype designed to find and test candidates. The Gloves of the Pugilist were a screening tool. And Kyboh — reckless, careless, unserious Kyboh — passed the test by accidentally destroying them.
Hjolmar's "I finish what I start" is the most dishonest thing he says in this scene. He doesn't care about the gloves. He cares about what Kyboh IS. The Aetherial Matrix quest is real — he does need it for the new gauntlet. But the gauntlet is not the endgame. The Echo Mimic is the endgame. And Kyboh just became the only person alive who can survive its creation.
Hjolmar will not reveal any of this until the calibration is complete (Act III of Kyboh's arc). For now he is a helpful craftsman with unusually intense interest in one broken-handed brawler. Let the party wonder why.
On Ismara: Hjolmar's amusement is genuine but calculated. He's glad to see his old colleague. He's also glad she's trapped and he's not. Their banter is real affection filtered through millennia of professional rivalry. But he will not help free her. Not because he can't — because he's not sure freeing Ismara is good for the world. She had plans. Big ones. Plans that required becoming a continent. He'd rather she stay a hat.

DAVINIA PERCEPTION (Corrected)
👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene 13 — the forge)
When Hjolmar shatters the gloves: Kyboh's skeleton lights up. Visible magical energy radiating from bones — hands through arms, ribs, spine. She can see the enchantment the way she sees leylines. Structural. Architectural. Embedded. Beautiful and terrifying.
During Hjolmar's tests: She can see NOTHING of what he's doing. The tuning forks are tonal instruments. They work in sound, resonance, vibration. Her eyes are irrelevant. She can see Hjolmar holding metal to Kyboh's body. She cannot see what he's hearing. She cannot see what he's finding. She is, for the first time since the transformation, completely blind to what matters most in the room. The most important diagnosis in the scene is happening in a domain she cannot access. This should frustrate her.
When the Anchor goes on: The light in Kyboh's skeleton goes dark. Instantly. The Anchor doesn't suppress it visually — it makes it INVISIBLE. Even to her. Like a candle blown out. She can no longer see the enchantment at all.
Hjolmar's forge: She can see it's a precision magical instrument. The anvil has intent carved into it — she reads it directly: SHAPE. CONTAIN. PRESERVE. The same vocabulary as the Crown.
Hjolmar himself: His aura is wrong. Too large for a Nord. Dense. Old. Layers of something she can't parse — like looking at a document with text written over text written over text. She doesn't understand what she's seeing. She's looking at a mind that has occupied multiple bodies and the magical residue of each one is still faintly present.
CROWN REACTION: Changes completely when Hjolmar addresses Ismara directly. See Beat 7. The Crown becomes more responsive, more present, more ALIVE in this room than anywhere else in the campaign. Ismara has encountered her intellectual equal for the first time in four thousand years. The whispers are sharper, funnier, more like a real person and less like a haunting. That should be both wonderful and deeply alarming.

COMPLETION CHECKLIST
✓ KYBOH: Knows skeleton is permanently enchanted with the Titan's Tithe. Knows it's innate, stackable with future gear. Knows blowback doubles each use (1, 2, 4, 8, 16, 32, 64...). Has the Anchor of Stasis. Has quest: Mzinchaleft for the Aetherial Matrix. Knows new gauntlet will let him stack and control the Tithe. Does NOT know about his multi-soul nature. Does NOT know about the Echo Mimic. Does NOT know Hjolmar has been searching for him.
✓ ORION: Gained Diagnostic Song — new tonal ability learned through observation, not teaching. Can read a target's stats and one unique ability.
✓ ALFONSO: Received diagnosis — two incompatible frequencies, months not years to harmonize them or be torn apart. Direction but no solution. The most terrifying medical appointment of his life.
✓ SAIJAH: Gained strategic intelligence — the Eldergleam is Skyrim's immune system, Dagon cult is attacking the root network, Danica's quest is the central front. Knows what she's fighting and why Kynareth chose her.
✓ DAVINIA: Met someone who knew Ismara personally. Learned the truth about the Crown — Ismara is a researcher trapped in her own experiment, not a goddess or demon. Saw the Crown become more alive and responsive than ever before. Learned Hjolmar cannot remove it. Learned the difference between his methodology (repairable vessels) and Ismara's (permanent fusion). Watched two ancient geniuses bicker while her skull was the subject.
✓ THE PARTY: Has the Mzinchaleft quest hook. Has intelligence about the Dagon threat. Has a sense of how vast and old the forces at work in this campaign truly are.


APPENDIX: NORA ASHVALE — FULL STAT BLOCK

Included here (not in an appendix per template rules, but as a persistent NPC reference since she appears across multiple scenes).
NORA ASHVALE Race: Breton (Dragonskin: once per adventure, half spell damage) Stone: Atronach (Spell Absorption 3x per combat, no FP regen on short rest) HP: 9 FP: 15 DR: 1 (Apprentice Robes) — or 8 (if she casts Ebonyflesh) Magic TN: 20
EQUIPMENT: Mother's Diadem: +1 FP per turn in combat Apprentice Robes: DR 1, School Attunement (Illusion)
SKILLS (Conscious): Expert Illusion — Quiet Casting on ALL spells Expert Alteration — Flesh spells, Paralyze, Detect Life Apprentice Destruction — Basic fire/frost/shock Apprentice Restoration — Healing, Lesser Ward
SKILLS (Unconscious — Master Conjuration): Full Conjuration tree. Involuntary. Triggers under extreme stress. GM controls when this activates. Not random — situational.
SOMATIC SYSTEM: Nora casts through physical gestures (the 12 Somatic Components). At Expert rank, she can attempt gesture swaps (Magic roll to swap one component). At Master (Conjuration), swaps are automatic.
TRAUMA RESPONSE: Triggered by GM call during high-stress situations. Five possible manifestations — GM chooses based on context. Not a random table. Crisis Competence: Under direct threat, Nora becomes clinical, precise, and devastatingly effective. The trembling starts AFTER.
COMBAT ROLE: She does NOT volunteer for combat. If the party is losing or someone is about to die, Crisis Competence activates and she intervenes with surgical precision. Otherwise she stays back, provides warnings and guidance, and conserves FP.
AP: 7 (Adept tier, approaching Expert)

PART 2: THE DIVERGENT PATHS The party chooses at Hjolmar's Forge. Both paths are complete modules. Run whichever they pick. The other doesn't happen.

📋 STRATEGIC NOTE: THE HEMMING CLOCK pick up here. 
Current session: 10. Path A (Riften): If they arrive by end of Session 11 → Path 1 (Danica is there, failing, needs them). If they delay past Session 11 → Path 2 (Danica succeeds alone, leaves with Krusp).
Path B (Mzinchaleft): Choosing this GUARANTEES Path 2. Every hour in the ruin confirms Hemming's death and Danica's departure with Krusp.
The party does not know these numbers. They feel the clock through rumor, smoke, and NPC urgency.
UPDATED PLAYER STATUS (POST-MIDDEN) Update these from the Midden Dashboard once the party exits.
DAVINIA Condition: Crown active. Intuition Void in effect. WIZARD EYES — Ismara Sight (permanent, irreversible). Sees auras, souls, leylines, invisible beings. Reads intent of all written language (auto-translate). Focal Crystal: [ ] Taken [ ] Left Blackmail/Gilded Cage letters in pocket. Penalties: Intuition Void. Physical world less real than magical layer (faces harder to read than auras).
KYBOH Condition: Anchor of Stasis fitted. Immune to Enchantments and Tonal Magic. Cannot use enchanted gear. Penalties: Magically deaf. No enchanted equipment benefits. New Goal: Aetherial Matrix from Mzinchaleft → Hjolmar forges new gauntlet.
ALFONSO Condition: Vrykolas transformation progressing. Travels with 1x Waterlogged Ghoul. Nora's book: [ ] Returned [ ] Still has it Penalties: None mechanical.
ORION Condition: Stage 3 Vampire (Peckish). Ring of the Pale Regent active. Varon is shadowing him. Penalties: Per vampire stage mechanics.
SAIJAH Condition: Psychic migraine pulses southeast (toward Riften). Hawk Talon/Feather equipped. Penalties: None.
NOT WITH THE PARTY: Ylva: At the Frozen Hearth inn, Winterhold. Nora: [ ] With party [ ] Remained at College Bjorn: Driving the cart. De-aging subtle but present. Still looks sixty, but healthier and steadier than he should.
NPC VOICES (JOURNEY)
Bjorn | Protective, weary, focused. Healthier than he should be. | "She's not just a horse. She's the only thing keeping | us from being animals."
Varon | Cold, surgical, purely efficient. Breton-passing. | "Sentiment is a luxury for those not facing an apocalypse."
Krosulhah | Arrogant, booming, draconic rage. | "Sahloknir was the mind; I am the talons. You will burn | for his silence."
GEAR | Precise, curious, mechanical politeness. Dwemer automaton. | "Hjolmar-Class Containment detected. Query: are you | operational, or are you inventory?"

PATH A: THE ROAD TO RIFTEN (THE LONG ROAD SOUTH)

Strategic Note: This is the "duty" path. The clock is live. If they move fast, they save Hemming and reach Danica. If they delay, Danica leaves with Krusp and Hemming dies.

SCENE A1: THE FORCED MARCH

Function: Establish the physical cost of speed. The party feels the clock in their bodies before they see its consequences. Location: Mountain passes between Winterhold and Eastmarch. Freezing rain and sleet. Visibility poor.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "Bjorn drives through the night. He doesn't ask permission; he just flicks the reins and Mable leans into the wind. The freezing rain comes sideways off the Sea of Ghosts, turning the road into a grey smear of ice and mud. You sleep in shifts on the hard, vibrating boards of the cart — or you don't sleep at all. Bjorn is in a light shirt, ignoring the cold. He looks different. His arms are thicker. His jaw is sharper. He still looks sixty, but it's a hard sixty — like a man who should be slowing down but isn't. He doesn't sleep."
Then improvise from: The cart rattles constantly. Ice forms on the canvas cover. Breath freezes on collars and scarves. Dawn is a grey line that doesn't get brighter. The horses' breath steams. Mable keeps her head down and pulls.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene A1 — the road)
Bjorn's aura is wrong. Everyone else on the cart has a normal living glow — tired, cold, dim from exhaustion. Bjorn's is BRIGHTER than it should be. Denser. Not the aura of a sixty-year-old man.
She can't identify what's different — she has no frame of reference for a Dragonborn soul because she's never seen one. But his aura doesn't match his body. It's too big for him. Like a coat that doesn't fit.
If she mentions it: "There's something strange about Bjorn. His light is... too much. I don't know what it means."
Don't explain further. Plant the seed. After the THIRD dragon soul, his aura will be visibly, dramatically larger than any mortal's. Davinia will be the first to understand something is fundamentally wrong with him.
THE MOVES
EXHAUSTION CHECK — EVERYONE: Might Check (TN 12). Each PC rolls.
Success: Maintains their edge. No penalty.
Failure: EXHAUSTED. → -2 penalty to ALL Stat Scores (Target Numbers) → Lasts until a Long Rest (which they CANNOT take without failing the Riften clock) → This is a permanent drag on the rest of the journey.
BJORN'S DE-AGING: Anyone who watches Bjorn during the drive notices: → His hands on the reins are NOT old man's hands. → His shoulders are broad. His posture is straight. → His posture is straight. His grip on the reins is steady. → He looks like a man twenty years younger than his papers say. → Not dramatic. Just... wrong. Healthier than road-weary sixty-year-olds have any right to be. → If asked, he says nothing. His jaw tightens.
📋 GM NOTE — BJORN'S DE-AGING TIMELINE
Current (post-Midden, pre-journey): Looks ~60 but unusually fit and steady. Subtle wrongness only.
Sahloknir (already happened): First soul absorption. Knocked him from broken-down 68 to a healthy-looking 60. He hid it. Party may have noticed small things.
Krosulhah (this session, IF killed): Second absorption. Drops him from 60 to 40-45. THIS is the visible alarm moment. Impossible to ignore. See the 🔒 box in Scene A2.
If Krosulhah FLEES: No soul. Bjorn stays at ~60. The big reveal shifts to the next dragon they kill.
Until the absorption: just plant small observations. After: let them freak out. Do NOT explain it for them.
EXIT The road narrows into a mountain pass. The wind dies. It gets quiet. Too quiet. → SCENE A2: Krosulhah.

SCENE A2: THE AMBUSH — KROSULHAH THE VENGEFUL

Function: A dragon ambush designed to disable the party's mobility. Krosulhah targets the cart, not the party. He wants them stranded. Location: Narrow pass between stone cliffs. High walls on both sides. Ice-slicked road.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The pass narrows between two cliff faces, barely wide enough for the cart. The wind has stopped entirely. The silence is wrong — the kind of silence that happens when every living thing in a valley has already hidden.
Then the shadow. It blots out the grey sky like a door closing. A dragon — smaller than Sahloknir but faster, angrier, built like a falcon made of stone and hate. It screams, and the sound echoes off the cliffs like a war drum.
Krosulhah. Sahloknir's wingman. And he's looking at the horses."
Then improvise from: The ice on the road cracks under the sound of the roar. Mable rears. Bjorn swears and grabs the brake. Rocks fall from the cliff face. The dragon doesn't land — it circles.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene A2 — Krosulhah)
The dragon's aura is enormous. A bonfire of ancient, cold-burning energy wrapped around a body of stone and scale. She's never seen anything this bright. Bjorn's oversized aura was subtle wrongness. This is a sun. Dragon souls are not mortal souls. They are VAST.
DURING THE FIGHT: She can see his Frost Breath charging before he fires — the energy gathers in his throat like a held breath of light. Half-second advance warning.
IF KROSULHAH IS KILLED: She sees the soul leave. And it is the most spectacular thing her new eyes have ever witnessed. The dragon's massive aura tears free from the body in a single violent eruption — a streak of white- gold light that arcs upward and then CURVES. It doesn't dissipate. It flies. With direction. With purpose. Down the road. Toward Bjorn.
She is the ONLY person who sees it choose a direction. Everyone else sees a streak of light vanish over the ridge. Davinia sees it TURN. Toward a specific person.
If she saw Bjorn's too-bright aura on the road (Scene A1), she can now connect the dots. Something is pulling dragon souls toward him. She doesn't know the word Dragonborn. But she knows what she saw.
CROWN REACTION: The Crown goes cold. Not silent — cold. Ismara recognizes what a dragon soul is. She spent four thousand years preparing to stop what dragon souls represent. The whisper is sharp: "Watch that man."
COMBAT: KROSULHAH (TL3 BLOOD DRAGON)
ARENA:
=======cliff face=======
[Krosulhah — AIRBORNE] ↓ strafing runs ↓
+--------------------+ | [cart] [Mable] | ← road (ice-slicked) | [Bjorn driving] | Difficult Terrain +--------------------+
=======cliff face=======
HIGH GROUND: Cliff ledges accessible by Agility check (TN 12). Ranged advantage.
KROSULHAH THE VENGEFUL Archetype: TL3 Boss (Biological — HP) HP: _____ / 150 DR: 10 IMMUNE: Frost, Fear WEAK: None (but grounding him is the key)
ATTACKS:
Bite (physical)
Melee
35 damage. Only when grounded.




Knocks target prone.
Frost Breath
30ft
25 frost damage (cone).
(spell — strafing)
cone
Road becomes Frozen (auto-prone




on movement without Agility TN14)
Wing Buffet
15ft
12 damage. Everyone in range
(physical — landing)
radius
makes Might TN 14 or is pushed




10ft and knocked prone.
Tail Sweep
10ft
18 damage. Rear arc only. Agility
(physical — grounded)
rear
TN 14 to dodge or knocked prone.

PASSIVE — Aerial Dominance: While airborne, Krosulhah CANNOT be hit by melee attacks. Ranged attacks and spells work but at Disadvantage (moving target). He performs strafing runs — Frost Breath then circles back.
PASSIVE — Predator's Focus: Primary target: The cart and Mable. Every other round, Krosulhah targets the road directly in front of the horses with Frost Breath.
When he targets the horses: → Bjorn must make Animal Handling (Guile TN 14). → Success: Horses swerve. Cart survives. → Failure: Horses slip. Cart slams into cliff wall. → AXLE SHATTERS. Mable is pinned. 3 HP remaining. → Cart is immobilized for the rest of the fight.
BEHAVIOR: Krosulhah does NOT land voluntarily. He strafes, circles, strafes. He's not trying to kill the party — he's trying to kill their transportation. If the cart is destroyed, he roars in triumph and continues attacking to finish stragglers.
PHASE TRANSITION — Grounded (forced): Krosulhah lands ONLY if: • He takes 50+ damage while airborne (wing injury) • A cliff face is collapsed onto him (environmental) • A spell roots/binds him (Paralyze, ice architecture, etc.)
Once grounded: He fights with savage desperation. Bite + Tail Sweep every round. Crawls toward wounded horses if able. Uses Wing Buffet to create space if surrounded.
⚠️ ⚠️ KYBOH'S LIMITATION
Kyboh no longer has Doubling. The Anchor of Stasis prevents tonal assistance and nullifies all enchanted gear. He must rely on pure physical damage and environmental tactics (collapsing cliff rock onto Krosulhah's wing). Raw spellcasting from allies still affects the dragon normally. Enchantment-based buffs are inert on him.
HOW PLAYERS WIN THIS OBVIOUS (Hard): Ranged fire at Disadvantage while airborne. Chip away at 150 HP through DR 10. Very expensive in FP and arrows.
SMART (Ground Him): Deal 50+ damage in the air to force a landing, then surround and burn him down in melee. Grounded Krosulhah is dangerous (35 bite, 18 tail sweep) but vulnerable.
BRILLIANT (Environment): Collapse a cliff face onto him. → Requires identifying weakened rock (Guile TN 12 to spot) → Then attacking the rock face (HP 30, DR 0) → Collapse: 40 damage to Krosulhah + automatic grounding + Staggered for 1 round. Devastating opener.
DESPERATE: If the cart is already destroyed and Mable is dying, the fight becomes purely survival. Drive him off (he retreats at 40 HP) or kill him. He's vengeful, not suicidal.
WHEN HE DIES / FLEES: At 40 HP: Krosulhah breaks off, roaring. "The dragon screams — not in pain but in rage. He wheels upward, trailing blood from a torn wing, and his voice echoes off the cliffs: 'This is not finished, insects. The World-Eater stirs. You have killed nothing. You have delayed nothing.' He vanishes into the grey sky."
If killed (0 HP): "The dragon crashes. The impact shakes the ground and splits the ice beneath him. He slides, clawing at stone, and comes to rest against the cliff face. His eye — one massive, furious amber eye — fixes on you. Then it dims."
LOOT:
Dragon Bones (×4)
Master-tier crafting material
Dragon Scales (×4)
Master-tier crafting material
Dragon Soul
See 🔒 GM EYES ONLY below.

⚠️ 🔒 GM EYES ONLY — THE SECOND SOUL
DURING THE FIGHT: Bjorn flees with the cart the moment Krosulhah attacks. Protecting the horses — smart, in-character. He drives hard down the road, out of sight around a bend. The party fights the dragon without him present.
IF KROSULHAH FLEES (40 HP): No dragon soul. No absorption. Bjorn stays at ~60. Skip the rest of this box entirely.
IF KROSULHAH IS KILLED: The dragon soul erupts from the corpse as a streak of light. It arcs upward — then streaks away down the road, over the ridge, toward where Bjorn fled. Gone. The party does NOT see the absorption.
⚠️ EXCEPTION — DAVINIA: She sees MORE than the others. The streak of light is not just light to her. It is a SOUL — vast, ancient, furious, trailing rage and cold. She can see it is a dragon's essence, not just energy. And she can see WHERE it goes: not over the ridge and gone. Toward Bjorn. Directly, purposefully toward Bjorn. She may not see the impact (he's around the bend), but she sees the trajectory. She KNOWS it went to him. Not near him. TO him.
When they find Bjorn afterward and he looks 40-45, she can see his aura has DOUBLED in size. It is enormous now. Wrong. Too big for any mortal. Two dragon souls burning inside a human frame. She knows. She can't prove it. But she knows.
Whether she tells the party is her choice. But the Crown whispers: "He is becoming something. Watch him."
WHAT ACTUALLY HAPPENS (off-screen, concurrent): This is the SECOND time. Bjorn recognizes the feeling the instant the light appears. He has time to grab the cart rail and brace before it hits.
Just as violent as the first. But he doesn't black out this time — he knows now that the pain stops. What scares him is what comes AFTER: the feeling of becoming MORE. Stronger, faster, younger. Again. The first time he could pretend it was shock or a curse. This time he can't deny that something is choosing him and he can't stop it.
PHYSICAL CHANGE: He drops from ~60 to 40-45. Dramatic. Not subtle anymore. Impossible to miss.
EMOTIONAL STATE: Not confused like the first time. Afraid. He KNOWS he's hiding something now. Sahloknir was "what the hell was that." Krosulhah is "it's happening again and I can't make it stop."
WHEN THE PARTY FINDS HIM (after the fight): Read aloud: "You find the cart a quarter mile down the road. Bjorn is sitting on the driver's bench, reins in his hands, staring straight ahead. He looks wrong. His face is leaner. His arms fill his sleeves differently. He looks like a man of forty-five, not sixty. The change is impossible to miss."
If asked what happened / why he looks different: Won't meet their eyes. "Good country air." Jaw tightens. Changes subject. If pressed hard: "I don't know. I don't want to talk about it. Can we just go?"
If asked about the soul / the light: "Went over the ridge. Gone." He's lying. Guile TN 14 to detect (he's a legendary talker, but he's rattled). Success: they know he's hiding something. Not what.
DO NOT REVEAL THE DRAGONBORN SECRET. Let clues accumulate. Bjorn will not confess.
ROUND TRACKER:
 Rnd | Dragon HP | Airborne? | Cart Status    | Notes
  ----+-----------+-----------+----------------+-------------
   1  |    /150   | YES       | Intact         |
   2  |    /150   |           |                |
   3  |    /150   |           |                |
   4  |    /150   |           |                |
   5  |    /150   |           |                |
   6  |    /150   |           |                |
   7  |    /150   |           |                |
   8  |    /150   |           |                |

EVERY ROUND REMEMBER: • Krosulhah targets horses every other round (Bjorn Guile TN 14) • Airborne = Disadvantage on ranged/spell, immune to melee • Ice-slicked road = Difficult Terrain (Agility TN 14 to move) • 50+ airborne damage = forced landing
AFTER THE FIGHT: Assess cart damage. If the axle shattered and Mable is hurt, proceed to Scene A3 (The Cruel Proposal). If the cart survived intact, skip to Scene A4 (Gates of Riften — Fast Arrival).
→ SCENE A3 or SCENE A4.

SCENE A3: THE CRUEL PROPOSAL — THE CROSSROADS

Function: Moral breaking point. Efficiency vs. Humanity. Bjorn vs. Varon. The party chooses who they are. Trigger: Cart is wrecked. Mable is lame (3 HP). Krosulhah is gone or dead. Location: The wreckage site. Cliff pass. Cold.
📋 THE MATH (GM EYES ONLY — do not tell players)
Fixing the axle + tending Mable: 6 hours. Journey on foot to Riften: 12 hours. Hemming Clock expires in: 14 hours.
Stay to fix cart → arrive Session 12 → PATH 2 (too late) Leave the cart → arrive Session 11 → PATH 1 (in time)
The party does NOT know these numbers. They feel the pressure through NPC urgency and common sense.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The cart is listing against the cliff wall, one wheel buckled, the axle snapped clean. Mable is on her side in the mud, her breath coming in harsh, panicked bursts. One of her legs is bent wrong. Bjorn is already on the ground beside her, his hands — steady hands — hands that shouldn't be that steady at his age — cradling her muzzle, whispering something you can't hear. The other horses stamp and pull at their traces, terrified.
Varon materializes from the shadows behind Davinia. His hand rests on the pommel of his short sword."
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene A3 — Varon's arrival)
She sees Varon BEFORE he materializes. His aura — cold, tightly controlled, deliberately dimmed — is visible to her even in shadow. She knows he's there seconds before the others do.
If she warns the party, he loses the dramatic entrance. If she doesn't, she's already making the calculation that his arrival is not a threat. Either way: invisible and hidden beings are visible to her. Varon's stealth is useless against her now. He doesn't know this yet. When he finds out, it will change their dynamic.
THE PEOPLE
VARON (The Shadowscale) Voice: Cold, surgical, purely efficient. Face a mask of Breton-passing indifference. Body language: Still. Hand on weapon. Not threatening — just ready. Attitude: This is math, not morality.
His Proposal (to Davinia): "The beast has done its work. The horse is dead weight. The cart is a tomb. If we stay, the plague finishes the Legion and the boy in Riften rots. I have my tools. I will shoot the horse now to end its noise, and we run. We can be at the gates by dawn."
BJORN (The War-Hound) Voice: Low, raw, barely controlled. On his knees in the mud. Body language: Cradling Mable. Not looking up. When he speaks, he looks at Davinia. Attitude: This is the line. Cross it and he's done.
His Answer: "You don't leave family behind on the road. Not for a mission, not for a King. You let him touch that horse, and I'm done with you. You'll have your 'efficiency,' but you'll have it alone. I don't haul monsters."
THE MOVES
This is Davinia's call. The party can weigh in, but she leads.
CHOICE A: THE RUTHLESS RUN (Varon's Path) Varon kills Mable. They leave the cart. They run.
→ Bjorn stands up slowly. He doesn't argue. He doesn't shout. He looks at Davinia for a long time. Then: "I'll bury her. You go." → BJORN IS PERMANENTLY LOST. He refuses to follow. He stays with the dead horse on the road.
→ Saijah's Corruption advances to Stage 2 (Justifying Cruelty).
→ They arrive in Riften at end of Session 11. → SCENE A4: Fast Arrival (Path 1).
CHOICE B: THE LOYAL FIX (Bjorn's Path) They stay. They repair the cart. They tend Mable.
→ 6 hours of work. Might checks for the repair. Restoration magic can stabilize Mable faster.
→ They arrive at start of Session 12. → SCENE A4: Slow Arrival (Path 2).
→ Bjorn is KEPT. Cart is operational. Mable walks with a limp but lives.
CHOICE C: CREATIVE SOLUTIONS Players may attempt alternatives. Reward creativity:
Leave the cart, take Mable, walk: → Slower than running (wounded horse pace). Still Path 2. But they keep Bjorn AND Mable.
Send Varon ahead as a runner to Riften: → Varon arrives first, provides intel. Party arrives late. Path 2, but with advance warning.
Magic solutions (heal Mable instantly, repair axle with Alteration, etc.): → If the spell and resources justify it, allow it. This could save both time AND the horse → Path 1. Good creative play should be rewarded.
EXIT Choice made. Consequences locked. → SCENE A4: Gates of Riften (appropriate arrival version).

SCENE A4: THE GATES OF RIFTEN

Function: Deliver the consequences of their speed. Two completely different Riftens based on arrival time. Location: The bridge overlooking the Riften Stables.
RUN THE VERSION THAT MATCHES THEIR ARRIVAL:
VERSION 1: FAST ARRIVAL (End of Session 11 — Path 1)
THE ROOM (Read Aloud): "The first thing you see is the flag — yellow, snapping in the wind above the north gate. Quarantine. Guards in vinegar-soaked masks patrol the bridge, their eyes nervous above the cloth. The city smells wrong even from here — camphor, woodsmoke, and something underneath that you don't want to name.
In the stables below the bridge, you see her. Danica. Her white robes are grey with filth. She's on her knees beside a dying miner, her hands glowing faintly with restoration magic that isn't working fast enough. She looks up as you approach. Her eyes are hard, exhausted, and filled with a mix of relief and accusation."
Then improvise from: Coughing from inside the walls. The sound of a cart being loaded with something heavy. A child crying somewhere. The yellow flag snaps in a cold wind.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Version 1 — fast arrival)
Danica's restoration magic is visible — golden light flowing from her hands into the miner. But it's failing. The spell's energy dissipates before it reaches the blood. The plague is eating the healing faster than Danica can produce it. She's pouring water into sand.
Beyond the stables, through the walls: the city's auras. Dozens of dim, flickering lights. The sick. The dying. The scale is visible to her in a way no one else can perceive. She knows instantly: Danica cannot do this alone.
DANICA'S STATE: She is overwhelmed. The plague is worse than she expected. Hemming Black-Briar is in a wasting coma. The city's resources are stretched to breaking.
Her first words: "You're late. But you're here. That's more than I expected."
What she needs: Immediate help. Hands, magic, supplies. The party has arrived in time to make a difference.
VERSION 2: SLOW ARRIVAL (Start of Session 12 — Path 2)
THE ROOM (Read Aloud): "The first thing you see is the flag — black, hanging limp above the north gate. Lockdown. The gates are barred and reinforced with timber. Guards with crossbows watch from the walls. Over the top of the walls, thick smoke rises — not cooking smoke. Pyre smoke. The burning of the dead.
No one greets you. A courier approaches from a side gate, holding a folded note. He hands it to Davinia without a word and walks away."
DANICA'S NOTE (hand to Davinia): "I realized why you sent me away. Because you're slow, and you're cold. I'm with people who act now. Don't look for me."
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Version 2 — slow arrival)
The pyre smoke is worse through her eyes. Each column carries the fading residue of extinguished auras — not souls (those are gone), but the afterimage of life burning away. The smoke isn't just smoke to her. It's evidence.
The note: she reads Danica's handwriting and feels the intent beneath it. Not just the words. The hurt. The fury. The specific moment Danica stopped believing in her. It hits harder than reading should.
CROWN REACTION: Nothing. Even Ismara has nothing to say about this. "You're cold." Danica doesn't know how literally true that is.
The Discovery (Guile/Lore check, TN 12): → Success: Local gossip confirms Danica was seen leaving two days ago with a Reachman (Krusp) and a group of heavily armed survivors. They headed toward a Dragon Priest lair in the mountains. → Failure: They know she's gone. Direction unclear.
HEMMING'S STATUS: Dead. Died during the night. The Black-Briar family is in mourning and fury. Maven Black-Briar is looking for someone to blame.
EXIT Path 1: Party enters Riften. Danica needs them. Hemming lives (for now). Path 2: Party enters a locked-down city. Danica is gone. Hemming is dead. Both paths continue into the Riften arc (next module).

PATH B: MZINCHALEFT — THE COGNITORIUM

Strategic Note: This is the "power" path. Choosing it guarantees Path 2 for Riften (Hemming dies, Danica leaves). Every hour here is an hour the plague takes Riften without them. The party gains the Aetherial Matrix and fixes Kyboh — at a cost.
NOTE: Hjolmar adds each party member's resonant frequency to the "allowed list" for the ice floe approach. They can now reach his forge freely without solving the puzzle again.

SCENE B1: THE WHITE SILENCE — JOURNEY TO THE RUIN

Function: Establish the isolation and wrongness of the deep north. Kyboh's Anchor reacts to the Dwemer tech. First combat: automated sentinels. Location: The frozen coastline of the Sea of Ghosts. A white-out blizzard. Sound doesn't travel — it's swallowed by the wind.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "North. Into the white. Hjolmar's coordinates take you along the coast where the Sea of Ghosts meets the frozen shore. The blizzard closes around you like a fist — visibility drops to thirty feet, then twenty, then arm's length. Sound doesn't carry here. It's swallowed. You shout and the word dies two feet from your mouth.
The ground changes. Under the snow, your boots catch on metal — buried Dwemer debris, bronze edges jutting through the ice like bones through skin. And the air hums. Not the Eye's resonance. Something older. Something mechanical."
Then improvise from: The cold is absolute. Eyelashes freeze shut. Metal on their person conducts the cold like a wire. Kyboh's Anchor of Stasis begins to vibrate — not painfully, but insistently, like it's being called home.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene B1 — the approach)
Buried Dwemer debris under the snow has faint residual energy — dead circuits, long dormant, but she can see the ghost of what they were. The scale is staggering. The debris field extends in every direction. This wasn't a building. It was a city.
Kyboh's Anchor: the dark suppression field around his neck is flickering, pulsing in rhythm with something ahead. The ruin is calling to Hjolmar's tools.
Spider Sentinels: invisible to everyone else (Silent Hunters passive) but NOT to her. She sees their tiny energy signatures under the snow. She can warn the party before the ambush. This negates the Guile TN 14 detection check entirely.
WHAT'S IN THIS ROOM
KYBOH'S ANCHOR REACTING: What they see: The collar vibrates. Pulls slightly north. If they investigate: The Anchor is resonating with Dwemer tonal frequencies from the ruin ahead. It's not dangerous — it's recognition. Hjolmar's tools speak the same language. Why planted here: Confirms they're on the right path. Gives Kyboh a physical connection to the destination.
BURIED DWEMER DEBRIS: What they see: Bronze edges and gear fragments under the snow. If they investigate: The perimeter of Mzinchaleft extends far beyond the visible entrance. The ruin is massive — the surface is just the tip. Why planted here: Scale. This isn't a cave. It's a city.
COMBAT: 3x DWEMER SPIDER SENTINELS (TL1)
DWEMER SPIDER SENTINEL (×3) Archetype: TL1 Minion (Construct — FP as health) FP Pool: _____ / 18 each DR: 5 (Dwemer brass) IMMUNE: Poison, Bleed, Disease, Fear, Illusion (Construct) WEAK: Shock — IGNORES DR
ATTACKS:
Static Shock
10ft
3 damage + drains 4 FP from
(spell)


target. FP drain is the real




threat — they're battery thieves
Leg Stab (physical)
Melee
5 damage. Target makes Agility




TN 12 or is Slowed.

PASSIVE — Silent Hunters: They make no sound. No detection by hearing. Must be spotted visually (Guile TN 14) or by Detect Life/Magic.
BEHAVIOR: Ambush from under the snow. Target the PC with the highest FP (they sense magical energy). Retreat if two are destroyed.
HOW PLAYERS WIN THIS: OBVIOUS: Physical attacks work fine. Low HP. SMART: Shock spells ignore their DR entirely. Sparks (1 FP) one-shots each spider. BRILLIANT: Let them drain FP, then follow their retreat back to the ruin entrance (they always return to base).
LOOT: Dwemer Cog (×3), Spider Legs (alchemy component).
AFTER THE FIGHT: Following the spiders' retreat path or Kyboh's Anchor pull leads to the ruin entrance.
→ SCENE B2: The Excavation.

SCENE B2: THE EXCAVATION — GUARDIAN

Function: The entrance and first real danger. A glitched Dwemer Sphere guards the way. Dead bandits show what happens when you get it wrong. Location: Massive bronze door set into a cliffside. Frozen bandit corpses arranged in "safe" positions that weren't safe.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The entrance to Mzinchaleft is a bronze door twenty feet tall, set into the cliff face like a mouth frozen mid-scream. Around it, the dead. Bandits — a dozen or more, frozen solid. But they didn't die fighting. One is halfway through a side door, sliced clean in half by a sliding plate. Another is frozen solid by a burst pipe, ice crystals growing from his open mouth. A third is pinned to the wall by a mechanical arm that deployed and never retracted.
They found the 'safe' spots. The safe spots weren't safe.
Inside the doorway, in the dim amber light of still-functioning Dwemer lamps, something moves. A sphere — brass, smooth, the size of a man curled into a ball. It deploys an arm-blade, spins 360 degrees, retracts it. Deploys. Spins. Retracts. Over and over. It's stuck."
Then improvise from: The bronze door is warm despite the snow — geothermal heat from inside. The dead bandits have been here for weeks. Animals haven't touched them — nothing comes this close to the ruin. The Sphere's repetitive motion is hypnotic.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene B2 — the entrance)
Dead bandits: no auras. Cold, dark bodies. But the traps that killed them still glow — sliding plate, burst pipe, mechanical arm all have faint active energy signatures. She can see which surfaces are trapped (they hum with intent: DETECT. ENGAGE. NEUTRALIZE). Massive advantage navigating the entrance — she points out traps before they trigger.
The Sphere: internal systems visible — a web of energy with a visible kink in the loop. The kinetic targeting system is cycling: searching for motion, locking, finding nothing, resetting. The glitch is a stutter in the energy pattern. She can see it's damaged, not hostile.
WHAT'S IN THIS ROOM
THE DEAD BANDITS: What they see: Killed by traps, not combat. If they investigate: Every death is a lesson in the ruin's automated defense systems. The sliding plate, the burst pipe, the mechanical arm — all still active. The ruin is not dead. It is patrolling. Why planted here: Teaches players that this dungeon kills with engineering, not magic. Respect the infrastructure.
THE GLITCHED SPHERE: What they see: Stuck in a loop. Deploy, spin, retract. If they investigate: Its targeting system is damaged. It attacks the nearest source of kinetic energy (whoever moved the most on their last turn). If everyone stays still, it continues its loop. It can be bypassed without combat. Why planted here: Introduces the Dwemer "kinetic targeting" mechanic that appears in the boss fight.
COMBAT: MALFUNCTIONING DWARVEN SPHERE (TL2 — Optional)
MALFUNCTIONING DWARVEN SPHERE Archetype: TL2 Elite (Construct — FP as health) FP Pool: _____ / 65 DR: 8 (Pristine Dwemer Brass) IMMUNE: Poison, Bleed, Disease, Fear, Illusion (Construct) WEAK: Shock — IGNORES DR
ATTACKS:
Arm-Blade Slash
Melee
14 damage. Attacks the PC who
(physical)


moved the furthest last turn.
Crossbow Bolt
Ranged
10 damage. Fires at the second
(physical)
30ft
highest-movement PC.
Shield Bash
Melee
8 damage + Staggered.
(physical)


Used when surrounded.

PASSIVE — Kinetic Targeting: The Sphere targets whoever moved the most distance on their previous turn. If no one moved, it returns to its loop.
PASSIVE — Glitch Loop: If ALL players remain still for one full round (no movement at all — attacks from standing position are fine), the Sphere resets to its loop and ignores them for 1 round. This can be exploited.
BEHAVIOR: Charges the highest-movement target. If that target stops moving, it switches to the next. Completely predictable — the glitch makes it exploitable.
HOW PLAYERS WIN THIS: OBVIOUS: Stand and fight. DR 8 is tough but 65 FP is beatable. SMART: Exploit the Glitch Loop. Freeze, attack from standing, freeze again. The Sphere keeps resetting. BRILLIANT: Bypass entirely. If the whole party moves slowly and deliberately (Minor Actions only for movement), they can walk past while it loops. No combat needed.
LOOT: Dwarven Metal Ingot (×2), Intact Dwemer Gyro (valuable component for Hjolmar).
AFTER THE FIGHT / BYPASS: Past the Sphere, the corridor opens to the Great Lift.
→ SCENE B3: The Tonal Descent.

SCENE B3: THE TONAL DESCENT — PUZZLE

Function: The puzzle encounter. A massive elevator operated by striking tonal resonators in the correct sequence. Wrong notes are dangerous. Location: A bronze elevator platform suspended above a 500-foot vertical shaft. Four brass resonator tubes at the cardinal points.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The corridor ends at the edge of a void. A vertical shaft drops straight down into darkness — five hundred feet at least, maybe more. The walls are smooth bronze, and set into them at regular intervals are massive gears that aren't turning.
A platform hangs in the center of the shaft, connected to the walls by four bronze arms. On the platform, at the north, south, east, and west edges, stand four brass tubes — each one taller than a man, open at the top like organ pipes. There's no lever. No wheel. No switch.
But etched into the floor of the platform, in a circle around the center, are runes. Atmoran runes."
Then improvise from: The air from below is warm and smells of oil and hot metal. The shaft hums — a low bass note from somewhere far below. The platform sways slightly. It's stable but it knows it can move.
WHAT'S IN THIS ROOM
THE ATMORAN RUNES: What they see: Runes etched in a circle on the platform floor. If they investigate: Kyboh can translate them — he has Urag's book. The runes describe a sequence: the order in which the four resonators must be struck to descend. Why planted here: Kyboh's research pays off. His preparation at the Arcanaeum is directly useful.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene B3 — the runes)
She can read them instantly. No book needed. The Atmoran runes light up with intent the moment she looks: an instruction sequence. West, North, South, East. She feels the ORDER as a directional pull — like the runes are pointing at the resonators in sequence.
GM NOTE: This is KYBOH'S moment. His research, his book, his translation. Let him solve it first. If he does, Davinia can confirm: "He's right. I can see it too." If he's stuck or absent, Davinia can solve it — but the scene is designed for Kyboh. Don't steal his win.
What she sees that nobody else does: the runes aren't just instructions. They're a WARNING. The intent beneath the sequence reads: DESCEND CORRECTLY OR THE SHAFT REJECTS YOU. The Dwemer who carved this meant it as a test, not a lock. The ruin wants to know if you're smart enough to deserve what's below.
THE FOUR RESONATORS: What they see: Brass tubes at N/S/E/W. Hollow. Designed to be struck. If they investigate: Each produces a different tone when hit. They're musical — a four-note scale. The sequence in the runes tells which order to play them. Why planted here: The puzzle itself.
THE 500-FOOT DROP: What they see: Straight down. Darkness. Warm air. If they investigate: Fatal fall. No ledges. No handholds. There's nothing to grab. Why planted here: The stakes for getting the puzzle wrong.
THE PUZZLE
THE SEQUENCE (from Kyboh's translation):
1: WEST
2: NORTH
3: SOUTH
4: EAST

MECHANICS: • Each resonator must be struck once in the correct order. • Correct strike: The platform descends one level. The gears in the walls engage with a deep, satisfying grinding sound. • Correct full sequence: Platform descends smoothly all the way to the Cognitorium. 2-minute ride.
WRONG NOTE: Every wrong strike jolts the platform violently. → Everyone on the platform: Agility Check (TN 12). → Success: Keep footing. → Failure: Tossed toward the edge. → Second failure (if already at edge): Hanging over the 500-foot drop. Might TN 14 to pull back up. Ally can help (Might TN 12).
SEQUENCE RESETS after a wrong note. Start over.
THE TWIST: As they solve the sequence and descend, the "Pulse" from the College is audible even here. The Dwemer machinery vibrates in sympathy with the Eye of Magnus. The entire shaft resonates. Nora notices: "The Eye's frequency. It reaches this far. The Dwemer built this to listen to it."
EXIT Platform descends to the Cognitorium. → SCENE B4: The Archive.

SCENE B4: THE ARCHIVE — THE SETBACK AND GEAR

Function: The setback — the Matrix isn't here. But GEAR is. Discovery of a Dwemer automaton companion who knows where the Matrix was moved and offers to guide them to the boss. Location: A vast, silent library of metallic scrolls and stone tablets. The Cognitorium — the archive of Mzinchaleft.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The platform settles with a hydraulic hiss, and the doors open onto silence. Not the dead silence of the surface — a preserved silence, like the inside of a sealed jar. The Cognitorium.
Rows of bronze shelving stretch into the darkness, holding thousands of metallic scrolls — Dwemer data-plates, each one etched with equations so fine they look like woodgrain. Stone tablets are mounted on the walls between Dwemer lamps that still burn after millennia.
At the far end of the archive, on a raised pedestal, sits an empty socket. The Aetherial Matrix was here. It's gone.
And in an alcove beside the empty pedestal, resting in a brass charging cradle, is a sphere. Smaller than the one at the entrance. Dormant. A single amber lens where an eye would be, dark and still."
Then improvise from: The air is dry and warm. Dust doesn't exist here — the ventilation still works. The data-plates hum faintly when touched. The empty pedestal has scorch marks around the socket, as if the Matrix was removed in a hurry.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene B4 — the Archive)
Every data-plate in this room glows with intent. She can read them. ALL of them. Not as Dwemer script — as compressed meaning. Millennia of engineering knowledge, instantly accessible.
The pedestal records: no roll needed. She reads the intent directly — the Matrix was relocated to the Centurion for safe integration. She can tell the party immediately.
The empty socket: residual energy. A fading afterimage of the Matrix's presence, like a warm spot on a chair someone just left. Removed recently in geological terms. Millennia ago in human terms.
GEAR (when he activates): A tiny, intricate web of Dwemer magical engineering. Precise. Clean. No soul. No life force. Just logic in brass. The Crown goes quiet around GEAR — Ismara recognizing something familiar. A mind in a container.
Nora's reaction confirms what Davinia sees: "No souls. Just math." Davinia can literally see this is true. GEAR is the cleanest thing in the room.
THE TEMPTATION: She could stay here for hours reading data-plates. The Crown WANTS her to. This is Ismara's language — preservation through architecture, knowledge compressed into crystal and metal. Every minute she spends reading makes the Crown's worldview feel more natural and her own feel more distant.
WHAT'S IN THIS ROOM
THE EMPTY PEDESTAL: What they see: Socket where the Matrix sat. Scorch marks. If they investigate: The Matrix was moved, not stolen. Dwemer records (if anyone can read them — Kyboh or Magic roll) indicate it was relocated to the "Primary Centurion" for "Safe Integration" during the Disappearance. It's deeper in the ruin. Why planted here: The setback. The prize isn't where it should be.
THE DATA-PLATES: What they see: Thousands of metallic scrolls with equations. If they investigate: These are the accumulated knowledge of Mzinchaleft's engineers. Decades of tonal architecture research. Anyone with Magic 12+ can spend time reading — but time is what they don't have. Why planted here: Temptation. Alfonso and Nora would both love to stay. But the clock ticks.
GEAR (dormant): What they see: A small brass sphere in a charging alcove. If they investigate: It's warm. The amber eye flickers when Kyboh gets within 5 feet — the Anchor of Stasis triggers recognition. Why planted here: The guide. GEAR knows where the Matrix is.
THE PEOPLE
GEAR (Dwemer Automaton — Cognitorium Attendant)
ACTIVATION: Kyboh's Anchor of Stasis within 5 feet. GEAR's eye lights up. It unfolds — legs deploy, stabilizing fins extend, the eye focuses on the collar.
Voice: Precise, curious, mechanical politeness. Speaks Common (learned from centuries of dormant language processing). Body language: Constantly scanning, eye clicking and refocusing. Tilts entire body to "look" at things. Curious like a cat. Attitude: Helpful but transactional. Data-driven.
First words: "Hjolmar-Class Containment detected. Query: are you operational, or are you inventory?"
If asked about:
Where's the Matrix?
"Relocated. Primary Centurion. Safe


Integration Protocol. Standard procedure


during Disappearance Event. The Centurion


is still active. Workshop level, two tiers


below."
Can he take them
"Affirmative. In exchange for observing
there?
your combat data. My records are incomplete.


I require samples of organic tactical


decision-making."
What is he?
"Cognitorium Attendant, designation GEAR.


Archive maintenance, visitor guidance, data


collection. Operational for... calculating.


...a very long time."
The Disappearance
"Insufficient data. All personnel ceased


biological function simultaneously. Cause


unknown. I was not consulted."
Hjolmar
"Known. Authorized user. He built the


Containment on your neck using our methods.


He has... good hands, for an organic."

NORA'S REACTION: She is fascinated. Her body language changes — she relaxes for the first time in the entire Midden/journey sequence. She asks GEAR questions about tonal architecture, about the data-plates, about the math.
If the party notices: "This is clean. No souls. Just math. It's... it's how magic should work."
This is the first time Nora feels safe around magic.
EXIT GEAR leads them deeper. Two tiers down to the workshop. → SCENE B5: The Centurion Prime.

SCENE B5: THE COGNITORIUM WORKSHOP — BOSS: CENTURION PRIME

Function: The climactic boss fight. You don't kill the Centurion — you drain its battery. The Matrix is visible in its chest. Location: A high-ceilinged Dwemer workshop. Steam vents in the walls. The Centurion Prime stands in an alcove, dormant until approached.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "The workshop is a cathedral of brass. The ceiling is fifty feet high, supported by columns of interlocking gears that still turn slowly. Steam vents line the walls, hissing softly. Workbenches the size of banquet tables are covered in half-finished projects — armor plates, weapon components, things with no name.
And in the alcove at the far end, standing upright in a cloud of steam, is the Centurion Prime. Twelve feet tall. Pristine brass plating, unmarked by time. Its chest is a crystal viewport, and behind the glass, glowing with a steady amber pulse, is the Aetherial Matrix.
It doesn't move. Its eyes are dark.
GEAR rolls to a stop beside you. His voice is quiet. 'Primary Centurion. Designation: unrecorded. Status: active but dormant. It will engage when the Matrix is threatened. I suggest you prepare before approaching.'"
⚠️ ⚠️ GEAR IS AN OBSERVER — NOT A COMBATANT
GEAR does not fight in this encounter. He is collecting "combat data" as promised. He rolls to a safe corner and watches with his amber lens clicking and refocusing.
He WILL provide verbal tactical hints if the party is struggling (see Scaling below), but he does not attack, tank, or use any of his combat systems.
GEAR becomes a full companion AFTER they leave Mzinchaleft. This fight is the party's audition for him, not the other way around.
Then improvise from: The steam is warm and smells of mineral oil. The gears in the columns produce a low grinding rhythm — the heartbeat of the ruin. The Centurion's surface has no dust, no corrosion. It looks like it was built yesterday. The Matrix behind the glass pulses in sync with Kyboh's Anchor.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Scene B5 — the Centurion)
The Aetherial Matrix blazes behind the chest plate — the brightest single object she's seen since the Eye of Magnus. Dense amber energy powering twelve feet of pristine brass. She can see the energy cycling from Matrix through limbs and back — a closed power loop. The chest plate is the bottleneck: all that energy passes through one viewport.
TACTICAL ADVANTAGE: She can see the weak point without being told. She can tell the party: "The crystal in its chest. Everything flows through it. Break that."
Matrix Pulse warning: the energy brightens in the chest 1 round before regen triggers. She can warn: "It's about to heal."
Steam vents BLOCK her vision the same way they block everyone else's. Steam is physical. Her sight doesn't bypass physical obscurement — she sees magic through walls of energy, not walls of water vapor.
CROWN REACTION: The Crown watches the Matrix with hunger. Not the object — the principle. A consciousness stored in crystal, powering a body indefinitely. Ismara's entire life's work in miniature. The whisper: "Beautiful."
COMBAT: CENTURION PRIME (TL3 BOSS)
ARENA:
[steam vent] [Centurion] [steam vent] (alcove)
[workbench] [workbench]
[gear column] [gear column]
[workbench] [workbench]
[party enters]
Steam Vents: Every 2 rounds, room becomes Heavily Obscured (Disadvantage ranged/magic)
CENTURION PRIME Archetype: TL3 Boss (Construct — FP as health, 0 HP) FP Pool: _____ / 200 DR: 12 (Pristine Dwemer Brass) IMMUNE: Poison, Bleed, Disease, Fear, Illusion, Frost WEAK: Shock — IGNORES DR entirely
ATTACKS:
Tonal Hammer
Melee
22 damage (physical). Target is
(primary — physical)


Staggered (loses Major Action).
Steam Blast
15ft
15 damage (fire). Everyone in
(area — recharge)
cone
cone. Used every 3rd round.
Stomp
10ft
10 damage. All adjacent targets.
(area — physical)
radius
Agility TN 14 or knocked prone.

PASSIVE — Steam Valve Cycle: Every 2 rounds, the workshop vents steam. The entire room becomes Heavily Obscured for 1 round (Disadvantage on all ranged attacks and spells). Melee is unaffected.
Steam Valve Tracker: [ ] Rnd 2 [ ] Rnd 4 [ ] Rnd 6 [ ] Rnd 8
PASSIVE — Brass Fortress: DR 12 makes physical attacks nearly useless unless Sundered. Sunder Armor works normally — each successful Sunder reduces DR by 1 permanently.
PASSIVE — Matrix Pulse: The Aetherial Matrix in its chest pulses every 3 rounds. When it pulses, the Centurion regenerates 10 FP. The crystal plate can be targeted directly (see Interactable Objects).
BEHAVIOR: Methodical. Not fast but relentless. Walks toward the nearest target and swings. Uses Steam Blast when multiple targets cluster. Uses Stomp to clear melee range if surrounded. Does not chase fleeing targets — guards the alcove.
INTERACTABLE OBJECTS
CRYSTAL CHEST PLATE: HP: _____ / 30 DR: 0 [ ] Intact [ ] Cracked [ ] Shattered The viewport in the Centurion's chest protecting the Matrix. Can be targeted specifically (called shot: -4 TN penalty). → Cracked (15 damage): Matrix visible. Regen reduced to 5 FP. → Shattered (30 damage): Matrix exposed. Regen stops. Can be pulled free (Might TN 14) while Centurion is Staggered. Removing the Matrix ends the fight instantly (the Centurion powers down).
STEAM VENTS (×4 — wall-mounted): Can be damaged (HP 10 each, DR 0) to redirect steam. → Destroyed vent: Aimed at Centurion, deals 8 fire damage per round and reduces its DR by 1 (overheating the brass). → All four destroyed: DR reduced by 4, constant fire damage.
WORKBENCHES: Provide half-cover if crouched behind them. Can be shoved (Might TN 12) into the Centurion's path — it stumbles (Staggered for 1 round, giving an opening for the chest plate or Sunder).
GEAR COLUMNS: Structural. If a column is destroyed (HP 40, DR 6), it collapses onto anything beneath it for 30 damage and creates Difficult Terrain. Risky but devastating.
HOW PLAYERS WIN THIS OBVIOUS (Hard — Drain the Battery): Pump raw damage through DR 12. Need to deal 200 effective FP of damage. At DR 12, weapons dealing less than 13 damage per hit do literally nothing. Power Attacks and heavy hitters only.
SMART (Shock Weakness): Shock magic ignores DR entirely. Sparks: 2 damage (no DR) per hit. Lightning Bolt: 4 FP damage + 2 shock (no DR) per cast. Chain Lightning: Devastating — multiple FP damage applications. This is the intended "puzzle" — use the element the ruin is built around.
BRILLIANT (Chest Plate + Extraction): → Crack the chest plate (15 damage to the plate, DR 0) → Shatter it (30 total) → Stagger the Centurion (workbench shove, Sunder, Shield Bash) → Pull the Matrix out (Might TN 14) → INSTANT WIN. The Centurion powers down. This rewards the party for reading the room and targeting the objective instead of the enemy.
CREATIVE (Alfonso's Infection): Alfonso can attempt to "infect" the Centurion's alchemical fluid system (the oily substance visible in its joints). → Requires: Proximity (melee range), a Conjuration or Alchemy-adjacent roll (Magic TN 14), and a sample of his plague magic. → Effect: The Centurion's joints seize. Slowed for 2 rounds (loses Minor Action). Its FP drains by 10/round as the fluid system fails. A creative logic bypass.
DESPERATE (Gear Column Collapse): Destroy a column (HP 40, DR 6) and drop it on the Centurion. 30 damage + Staggered. But the collapsing column also creates Difficult Terrain and risks hitting party members (Agility TN 14 to dodge if within 15ft).
WHEN IT "DIES" (0 FP): "The Centurion doesn't fall. It slows. The hammer arm drops to its side. The legs lock. The amber eye dims from bright to pale to nothing. Steam hisses from every joint as the internal pressure equalizes. It stands there, a perfect brass statue, twelve feet of dead engineering.
The chest plate — cracked, shattered, or still intact — goes dark. Behind it, the Aetherial Matrix pulses alone, unconnected, waiting."
EXTRACTION (if chest plate not already shattered): Might TN 12 to open the dormant chest plate (easier now). The Matrix comes free with a click.
LOOT:
Aetherial Matrix
QUEST ITEM. Fixes Kyboh. Hjolmar


forges new gauntlet with this.
Dwemer Metal Ingots (×4)
Tier 3 crafting material.
Centurion Dynamo Core
Rare power source. Expert-tier


enchanting component.
Intact Dwemer Cogs (×6)
Valuable trade/crafting goods.

ROUND TRACKER:
 Rnd | Boss FP | Chest Plate | Steam? | Vents Left | Notes
  ----+---------+-------------+--------+------------+----------
   1  |   /200  |   /30       |        | 4          |
   2  |   /200  |   /30       | STEAM  |            |
   3  |   /200  |   /30       |        |            | Matrix Pulse
   4  |   /200  |   /30       | STEAM  |            |
   5  |   /200  |   /30       |        |            |
   6  |   /200  |   /30       | STEAM  |            | Matrix Pulse
   7  |   /200  |   /30       |        |            |
   8  |   /200  |   /30       | STEAM  |            |
   9  |   /200  |   /30       |        |            | Matrix Pulse
  10  |   /200  |   /30       | STEAM  |            |

EVERY ROUND REMEMBER: • DR 12 — physical attacks under 13 damage do NOTHING • Shock ignores DR entirely • Steam vents every 2 rounds (Disadvantage ranged/magic) • Matrix Pulse every 3 rounds (regen 10 FP unless plate cracked) • Tonal Hammer staggers on hit (target loses Major Action)
SCALING: If party struggles: GEAR provides tactical analysis — "The chest plate has no armoring. Direct strikes to the viewport are optimal." If party breezes: Centurion enters "Emergency Protocol" at 50 FP — attacks twice per round (Tonal Hammer + Stomp).
AFTER THE FIGHT: Matrix obtained. GEAR congratulates them in his flat, data-collecting way. Nora touches the Matrix and goes quiet.
→ SCENE B6: The Reward and the Reckoning.

SCENE B6: THE REWARD AND THE RECKONING

Function: The emotional payoff for the Mzinchaleft path, immediately followed by the cost. They got what they came for — and they see the smoke. Location: Surface. Outside the ruin entrance. The blizzard has cleared.
THE ROOM (Read Aloud) "You emerge from the bronze doors into silence. The blizzard is gone. The sky is clear for the first time since Winterhold — pale blue, cold, enormous. The Sea of Ghosts stretches north, grey and still.
Kyboh holds the Matrix. It doesn't hum anymore. The Anchor of Stasis is quiet — perfectly, completely quiet. For the first time since the gloves fused, the silence is absolute. No static. No vibration. Just... nothing. Peace.
Then Bjorn points south."
(Pause here. Let the moment land.)
"Smoke. A column of black smoke, rising from the southeast. Not a campfire. Not a forge. A city's worth of smoke. Riften."
Then improvise from: The cold air is sharp and clean after the ruin's warmth. Seabirds circle overhead. The smoke column is visible from fifty miles away. It doesn't stop.
👁️ 👁️ DAVINIA SEES (Path B exit — the smoke)
The smoke column to the southeast carries fading-aura residue — from fifty miles away it looks like a pillar of dim light rising from the city. She can see that people are dying. Not metaphorically. The evidence is in the air. No one else knows this yet. They see smoke. She sees death.
Kyboh's Anchor: where his skeleton was dark and suppressed, the Matrix in his hands now pulses faintly. Something has changed. The Anchor is satisfied. The Matrix is resonating with it. She doesn't understand the tonal mechanics but she can see the magical signature shift.
CROWN REACTION: The Crown goes very still when she sees the smoke. Ismara knows what mass death looks like. Four thousand years ago she watched holds burn. The whisper is almost gentle: "You cannot save them all. You never could." The most dangerous thing the Crown has ever said — because it's true, and Davinia knows it's true, and agreeing with the Crown feels a little more natural every time.
THE PEOPLE
BJORN He looks at the smoke. He does the math. "We've been in there for six hours. Plus the travel. It's been three days since we left Winterhold." Pause. "That's a lot of fire for a peaceful city. We can head to Hjolmar now to finish your hands, or we can ride for the smoke. But I think we're already late."
THE MOVES
THE FINAL DECISION: This is the last fork before Path 2 locks completely.
Go to Hjolmar first (finish Kyboh's cure): → Hjolmar takes the Matrix. Forges the new gauntlet. → Kyboh's hands are fixed. Anchor removed. Full power. → Add another half-day of travel time. → They arrive in Riften VERY late. → Path 2 is absolute. Hemming dead. Danica gone.
Ride for Riften immediately: → They keep the Matrix but Kyboh stays collared. → Arrive in Riften. Still Path 2 (too late regardless). → But they arrive with urgency, not after leisure. → Danica is gone but the trail is warmer.
Either way: Path 2. The choice here is about character, not outcome. Do they stop for themselves or run toward the fire?
⚠️ DO NOT TELL PLAYERS Path 2 IS LOCKED. Let them make the choice believing it matters. The dramatic irony is that it DOES matter — just not for Hemming. It matters for who they are.
KYBOH'S MOMENT (if they go to Hjolmar): Hjolmar takes the Matrix. Works through the night. The new gauntlet replaces the Anchor of Stasis.
"Hjolmar sets the Matrix into the gauntlet frame and strikes the final pin. The Anchor of Stasis falls away. For one heartbeat, the tonal static floods back — screaming, vibrating, threatening to shake Kyboh apart. Then the gauntlet activates. The vibration doesn't stop. It's... conducted. Channeled. Controlled. His hands hum, but it's a clean hum. A tool's hum. For the first time, the enchantment in his bones isn't killing him. It's his."
⚔️ AETHERIAL GAUNTLET — REPLACES ANCHOR OF STASIS
The gauntlet HARNESSES the bone enchantment rather than suppressing it. Kyboh can use enchanted gear again. The tonal matrix in his skeleton is now an asset.
CORE MECHANIC — STORED DOUBLING: When Kyboh lands a killing blow, he earns a Doubling charge. Instead of the old system (immediate forced doubling), he can now STORE the charge for later use.
Stack | Multiplier | Effect ------+------------+-------------------------------------- 1 | ×2 | Next attack deals double damage. 2 | ×3 | Next attack deals triple damage. 3 | ×4 | Next attack deals quadruple damage. 4 | 💥 CATASTROPHIC DETONATION 💥 | | Uncontrolled tonal explosion. | | 40 damage to everything in 40ft radius. | | Kyboh and his target take 2× (80 dmg). | | Hits EVERYONE in range. Ally and foe.
RULES: • Charges are earned ONLY on killing blows. • Kyboh CHOOSES when to spend. Spending applies the current multiplier to his next attack, then resets to 0. • He cannot "hold" at 4 — reaching 4 stacks triggers the detonation IMMEDIATELY. No choice. • Stacks persist between combats until spent or detonated. • The gauntlet hums louder with each stack. At 3, it's audible to everyone nearby. Enemies might notice.
DESIGN INTENT: This forces Kyboh to think about his power. Does he burn the ×2 on a minion to stay safe? Or does he hold through fodder kills to reach ×4 for the boss — knowing that one more kill tips him into catastrophe? Every killing blow is now a decision point: spend or gamble.
STACK TRACKER: [ ] 1 (×2) [ ] 2 (×3) [ ] 3 (×4) [ ] 4 (💥 BOOM)
EXIT — END OF PATH B Party rides south toward the smoke. They arrive in Riften to Path 2 (same as Scene A4, Version 2): Black flag. Lockdown. Pyre smoke. Danica's note. Hemming dead.
→ Continue into the Riften arc (next module).

END OF MODULE — ARC 2 COMPLETE

